I'm very pleased to have this interview to promote our local talent; please read on to get in on the conversation….
5) Love Cry Want- Angel’s Wing- 4:46
You've been dying to know. It's been stressing you out. You've had bad dreams. The thought of it makes you want to go kick a teacher in the shins.
The final touch was a Superman logo that I had piped with royal icing ahead of time. It was exactly like piping royal icing on a cookie, except that I piped it on waxed paper instead! And then I just peeled them off (carefully) and placed them on top of the cupcakes.
Wedding planning is going in full force. We will be sending out invitations in a couple weeks. It is getting so close! Erica and I were talking about when Lauren got engaged we thought the wedding would be forever away, but it is in less than a month and then mine is a month after that. It's crazy how fast it has gone by!
I know it seems like there are a lot of ingredients.. and there are. You can use what you have on hand and the soup will still be good.
SOOoooo..how was your day?
But then came the question, do I purchase shoe trees to go with these shoes or not? To do so would wipe out the savings I had made. I confess that I didn’t agonise too long over that decision. The money saved by using Tesco vouchers was spent on shoe trees…. On balance I think it was probably a good call. However, it means that I now have shoe trees which cost more than the shoe they are in! Didn’t see that coming….
Daytime Activities: Wear interview appropriate attire for the daytime (pant suit, dress, etc.). The participants will be interviewed following lunch.
This book comes across as a “Best of” album and, while it works for music, I’m not convinced it works in a book. I found it a little disjointed at times and the lack of flow between chapters meant I couldn’t read large chunks of the book at a time, regardless of the attempt of an overall theme.
I'm not the kind of girl who strives for fame or anything, but even I have to admit that it would be kind of cool to have people know your name :)
Because I am the kind of grandma girl who only likes to read about this kind of risk-taking, it’s the perfect book for me.
Despite years in church and Sunday school, God was more a distant relative I wished I knew. I grew up with a gnawing sense of incompleteness, and longed to find meaning and purpose in life. Strangely, it was shortly before Christmas years later that it found me.
Until next time, thank you so much for your visit. Take care everyone and I hope the sun smiles on you.
9. The Sharia Law: “Obama wants it to be okay for us to practice Islam. I am not okay with this.” –Lordsburg, NM—Love’s Gas and Travel Center
The gossip is still going strong with the mystery woman and she is not yet revealed. And I still have no idea who it is, perhaps the next book will be more revealing. I have my suspects and waiting impatiently to find out.
But, like, whatever. My interest lies in whether we're changing the nature of love. Is love analogue or digital? Do we look at love like a Caravaggio or a PDF file? Is the answer as obvious as it seems?
“Yup. She’s not going to breathe another word. I told her that I knew she was the one talking of it and if it got spread here, I’d know it was her.”
Overall I really loved Queens Day and wish we had something similar – the Jubilee is not going to be remotely the same! How could you not love just wondering around a city where everyone is happy, there is such a great atmosphere and there is music to listen to while you chill with those around you. I can hardly think of anything better. Well maybe if there was a bonfire..
In this respect, we could reasonably view it as a measure to ensure some modicum of child well-being. And, as the Center on Budget and Policy Priorities reports, it does exactly that.
and will be available for purchase
The new year is here and with that, people begin to think about changes and improvements. It is a good time to do so. Many of us make resolutions or set new goals. So, lately I've been thinking more and more about the foods I eat. After all, diet and exercise is the basis for good health.
So. I stop off, buy some diesel, head over to the air pump "Digital Tyre Inflator" it says.
We’ll probably leave Ljubljana around 20:00, and drive all the way to Istanbul on the first day, that’s about 1500km, and i think we’ll need about 19 hours to reach our first goal as we need to stop at the border crossings, petrol stations, for lunch etc.
SRM 3
2-17 Winnipeg, MAN MTS Centre
Cobalt Turquoise Light
“You’ll sit there until all that spinach is gone.”
Guys, I’m not all that quiet or meek. Not at all. Hell, I’m just as loud as the rest of you. And it’s thanks to my dancing roots I can be like that. I’m a Jay who grew up around dance. And my friends and I will blow the competition away (or, kick-hop-step) with our Island flare. Look out Halifax, we’re coming for you!
Truman Wiley always ran away at the first sign of trouble. It is why he was estranged from his family, riddled with debt and in trouble with loan sharks. He was a man who spent his life wrapped up in his job, so when he lost his job due to the economy he was completely lost and hopeless. Add to that the compulsive gambling and the huge debt he owed to a man of questionable character and you have a man who is willing to do anything.
Interns = Baylor undergraduates, 85% female, journalism and family & consumer science majors only, who work for $2.13/hr + tips. The interns clock in at the ALICO, but their work carries them around the world, assisting the BearMeat Editorial Board in our search for humor. Our internship program was recently approved as a federal work-study job, and since the average hours worked in a week is somewhere between 35 and 55, our interns can expect quite a form-letter of recommendation.
That's the song that the clown from Liar Liar sings as a birthday song.
There are many teachings that are playing with the energies of the human race and these teachings will now begin to dissolve, they no longer serve a race of BEings that are now beginning to remember, to come into balance and to come into the flow of ALL that IS. The mind will try to move the balance back to being one of the mind controlling the body but that is not balance dear ones, the body is but a VEHICLE, an instrument that is used by the SOUL to move around on the planet of incarnation. The teachings of distortion can be so deep in many in the human race that they believe they are the body and not the SOUL. We guide for you to look at this and to begin to dissolve this for this is but smoke and mirrors created by a race that sought to contain and suppress the human race.
Brown Cow and I fell in love on a rainy Saturday morn in the refrigerated section of a local Sams club. It called out to me by throwing it's voice like a ventriloquist to a lady wearing an apron and it said, "Wanna try me?" I couldn't get past that raspy, high pitched female voice and said, "Yaaa! It's free sample Saturday at Sams." One bite was all it took for me to say, "I'll forever commit myself to you Brown Cow."
All of a sudden, as I'm holding 3 packages (because NOW they had the golden and chocolate, bottom row left) and contemplating whether I needed another Snowball... someone tapped me on the back and I turned and this little old lady said "Go ahead dear... take them all...." and I was mortified! I tried to explain about Isabelle, and she said "Of course, they're for the cat..."
As the alarm went off I was, mostly, ready to go. I just had to finish listening to a song. Up I went. I wasn't sure what to do first. The bins, I decided, and they are now in their usual places. Then laundry had to be switched out. I had a few towels left in the drier, the ones I feared would get moldy. They are good (tested one while showering this morning, or they would have been washed again), so I folded and put those away. I also cleaned out the bottom of two of my clothes baskets. I have no idea what cats do in there, or why, but... Yeah, glad I caught that. I'll clean the other basket sometime soon, too. I washed the dishes, leaving the plates and bowls to air dry but I like hand drying my silverware. You can use the spoons to shave with. That's just how I like it. I did a couple of odds and ends between here, there, this, and that too, though they aren't coming to mind. The little forgetme's of cleaning and regulating a home, things often overlooked even when I am running clean. Still, a spit-and-lick now and then at least makes me feel like I'm... taking care. Then I opened up all the windows. It's 72 F inside as such, just right.
Whatever the explanation, a cover-up is outrageous. Mr Gorbuntsov’s neighbours were kept in the dark, and therefore incapable of estimating the danger they were in. And the wider public were not told that a Russian mafia-style attempted killing had taken place on British soil.
I think it's time to admit something to you, friends and listeners-of-my-music. While it's true that I have a generally sunny disposition, I, too, am occasionally laid low by a sudden attack of the WTFs. They creep in at night, usually when I'm "hangry" (that familiar hybrid of 'hungry' and 'angry', articulated to me by the formidable Regan Kelly), and ask me, snarlingly, WTF I'm doing with my life.
It is rumoured that the car’s body is expected to be dropped onto the chassis of the GRMN MRS prototype, which has been under going testing at Fuji Speedway. GRMN stands for Gazoo Racing Meister of Nurburgring and was named after Nurburgring expert Hiromu Naruse, Toyota’s late godfather of sports car development.
but honour it with a touch of
I know that many of you have made New Year's Resolutions to make improvements to your 18th century impressions. Some will try hand sewing a complete garment for the first time, others will try their hand at making a new accessory, but whatever we choose, there is one area that we all need work in: HOSIERY!
Writing While Waiting is the one and only thing a writer should do. I mean, besides painting, sculpting, writing songs, or doing anything else creative that calls your soul into being in the world.
Michael Marshall Smith – The Man Who Drew Cats
genius, i tell ya!
I know you will and tomorrow night we are going to have a spanking. I think we need to reconnect.
onion - 3
Argh. I hate the new blogger interface. I don't care how 'clean' it looks. I don't want to use it, I want the old interface back...but apparently I had to finally change... and I frickin' hate it.
The survey of 500 Likely Voters in Wisconsin was conducted on May 9, 2012 by Rasmussen Reports. The margin of sampling error is +/- 4.5 percentage points with a 95% level of confidence. Field work for all Rasmussen Reports surveys is conducted by Pulse Opinion Research, LLC. See methodology.
To start off with any individual should be capable of make a substantial extra income from taking surveys online. It certainly should be within your grasp to make several hundred dollars a week by putting in a few hours of work a day, and once you get the hang of it the paychecks will become bigger and bigger.
Abel, on the other hand, was the first man of faith. Prior to the Fall, Adam and Eve had no need of faith in the same way as their descendants. They lived in the paradise of Eden and had direct contact with God. Their children were the first to have need of faith in its fullest sense.
But I can almost hear a sharp intake of breath from the Sisters, not to mention my daughters. How COULD you enjoy a play about the subjugation through deprivation and humiliation of a strong-minded woman?
can opener
Aroma was light, mild coffee and cream.
9:30-- Get home, (too late to write), go to bed too late... again.
Tammy Hair made a adorable card using This little piggy had Chardonnay from artist Suzanne Urban. Well, if I was going to blow a house down, I best pick the piggy who is going to serve me some Chardonnay. How delightful!
“What happened???”screamed Andy,so did some of the guests entertaining around in the lobby.
Cabinet set up an Inter Departmental Committee to look into preventing an increase in the number. It reported its findings in December 1953. This Inter Departmental Committee comprised Ministry of Labour and National Service, the National Assistance Board, the Colonial Office and Chief Constables from areas where immigrants were settling.
The disturbing image was the top result suggested to anyone who typed “Michelle Obama” into Google Images, the firm’s picture search engine.
Meanwhile, in a medium-sized pot, heat the canola oil over medium heat until rippling and hot. Add the onion and cook for 2-3 minutes. Stir in the pepper, ginger, salt, garlic, coriander, turmeric and curry powder. Continue cooking over medium heat, stirring often, until the mixture is very fragrant and the onion is soft and translucent, about 5-7 minutes. Add the undrained tomatoes to the pot and cook, stirring and scraping up the browned bits from the bottom, for about 1 minute. Increase the heat to medium-high and simmer for 5-10 minutes, stirring often. Add the coconut milk, stirring to combine. Bring the mixture to a boil and add the shrimp and any accumulated juices from the marinade. Bring the mixture to a simmer and cook until the shrimp are curled, lightly pink and cooked through, about 2-4 minutes. Stir in the cilantro. Serve over hot, cooked rice, if desired.
"Of course not," he says. "We all know that windmills are a self-indulgent and sanctimonious luxury whose purpose is to make us feel good. Had Europe genuinely depended on green energy on Friday, by Sunday thousands would be dead from frostbite and exposure."
Q. What advice would you like to pass on to other writers working toward publication?
8. Laurie
At 7:28 we find the waiting room and register
5. Fill each muffin cup ~3/4 full. Bake for 25 minutes or until a skewer shows only moist crumbs attached (mine were done just after 20 minutes), rotating the pans at the halfway point. Allow cupcakes to cool completely in the pans before removing.
It is a weird thing to decide to write about the fact that you almost died. It isn't a feeling that you can really put into words. So, I am going to write about it in terms of the joy, the blessing, the praise that fills my heart because of the work of Almighty God in my life through this experience.
And now Margy comes up behind him and massages his shoulders. “No, you’re not,” she says. “Roy Rogers is done. Mister Rogers still has a ways to go.”
And so it was decided. 9 short minutes. It was my Violet hour. You’d not be touched outside in the Sun, for 9 minutes!
Oooooh it's Tuesday again and time for TLT! Totally Ladybug Tuesday!
McLaren frowns on “the theory of penal substitutionary atonement.” He asks, “Where do you primarily find God on Good Friday?” and concludes that “God is located first and foremost with the crucified one.” I agree. But what does it mean that He was “delivered up by the predetermined plan and foreknowledge of God”? (Acts 2:23; see also 4:27, 28.) Whose wrath was propitiated by Christ’s death? The work of Christ on the cross can only be explained in the light of the doctrine of the threefold person of God and the incarnation of the Son.
Greasy fry up would do about now. Hold that thought though. Back to the memory of that little bald headed suitor, the apparent source of all the warm runny feelings. He wasn’t anything special in the looks department, it had to be admitted, and she normally didn’t go for guys who were shorter than she was, but he scored points over the majority of her potential suitors in that he was (or at least appeared to be) interested in her, which despite her sunny disposition and many ample plus points was rare enough these days. Hell, she could always just dump him if Dolph or Arnie came knocking.
I am sure this is sounding very familiar to all those single and DIY moms out there, right? We know the list could go on and on.
According to John A Carusso's book The Southern Frontier (1969) de soto was also granted a track of land, 12 leagues square, anywhere in Florida that touched neither seaport or chief town. He was free to import, one hundred Negro slaves , a third of whom would be women, which were given to him free of duty. King Charles V also laid claim to half of all gold, jewels, silver, pearls or any other objects of value, which de Soto might obtain while on the expedition. De Soto was given authority by the King to plunder burial grounds, seplecures, Indian temples and sacred sites. After the Kings cut ,the spoils were to be divided equally among the conquerers.
Of course, without an agent, they’ll probably low-ball you at first. Not to mention, some NYC publishers won’t offer this kind of money regardless of what the quick and dirty formula says (and if you join RWA, the members will tell you which publishers won’t offer above 5k no matter what).
Unwin then goes on to discuss in some detail the ideas of Camillo Sitte
Spokespersons
The landlord's laugh was ready chorus:
The ngf kept up the attitude I was used to. We finally arrived at our destination we piled out of van. Immediately a family pushing a stroller passed us. S. was leaning against the van I was facing her about 6 inches away, suddenly S. wailed out, “Why do there have to be so many babies here?!!” I felt it, I felt how you can sometimes feel like a wave of energy through my body, a pain that did not feel like mine at all, like hers. I watched C. envelope S. in her arms. I stared letting the pain wash out of my body. She did not have an abortion, she relinquished. I said nothing to anyone ever. I mean why?
“Or flexible,” suggested Emma.
The most important part of the process happens in the wooden barrels, which themselves have their own ecosystems. What develops in the casks is straight lambic, some of which breweries may sell without blending. You get interesting but variable character from straight lambic. The real triumph of this style of brewing comes when lambic-makers blend the barrels and then add younger, fresher year-old lambic to add liveliness and effervescence to the sharp, dry, and completely still lambics that result after three years.
Author: Kheryn Casey
We sing this hymn as a hymn of invitation – in a Baptist church, the “Invitational Hymn” is the time during the worship service when people publicly affirm their faith in Christ. But this hymn also holds a deeper invitation – God’s self, through Christ, invites us on this journey. Taking the first step is the easiest part, in some ways. Many never get much farther on the journey.
Got to go on despite the lashing of the winds
This blog is dedicated to those projects...interrupted by the occasional Saturday morning race or training run and Italian cooking and wine drinking.
Here's one of their classics with original lineup and new drummer singing.
LIMERICK REVIEW: There once were a popular clique
Anyway, I thought I'd show you some of the owls in my home right now, besides the already mentioned owl wreath. I have many owl "projects" in the works so this is only a sampling.
You say it’s only in my head
At my grandma's house, we had a lovely meal, then I took a few pictures.
Muhyiddin’s statement is very much in keeping with the ridiculous stuff that we keep having to put up with. Don’t bring up my past transgressions even though I have not owned up to it because it is in the past.
* IP landscapes are often cluttered due to wide X-licenses, encumbrances / deal clauses, standards and what's commonly seen as the "troll threat".
Another question is raised regarding the impact of popular culture and modernity over a very old religious way of life. The Lamas discuss whether it is right for the young ones to be pulled in by the material lure of the world cup. Is material pleasure the ultimate source of evil? Or does religion have to give place to modernity as well?
Ellen Carvill-Ziemer
It's also important to me that most of my private life is private - so I don't blog too much about my family or the conversations I have with other people - and when I do (like now) I stick to what I say and leave out what they say. I don't put pictures of Small Fry and Mr on here because they wouldn't like it and I generally don't blog too much or too specifically about my freelance work because that effects other people too.
Can you feel my pain? Seriously? The child and his mother should have predicted that family issues would come up in July, and gotten a head start on that important summer work the minute school let out? It's wrong for a parent to allow her child any sort of break from the rigors of schoolwork? Can this teacher feel the student's pain? In my opinion, summer should be a sacred time, completely free of schoolwork. That would solve this problem for parents, students, and teachers.
This little 7 year old girl knows more English than my host mom, or my host siblings. She is, in a word, adorable. She attends my co-teacher's private school, and gets out of class as I head into class to teach. One day I was having a particularly rotten day and was waiting for the classes to let out. I was on my phone when I felt a hand on my arm. There she was squatting in front of me. She looked at me with her big beautiful Cambodian eyes and asked "when are you going to come play with my puppy?"
Sit back. Relax. Enjoy COACC.
8. California English, Pt. 2 – Vampire Weekend
I know I have posted about my math work stations before, but my classroom is forever evolving. I change things so often that everything rarely stays the same year after year.
3. Animals love me, even guard dogs will let me pet them. (blowing their owner's minds)
From Thursday 19 April until Sunday 6 May, will be in Valencia this spectacular show, which has its origins in 1810 in Germany, with the wedding of Prince Louis I to Princess Therese of Saxe-Altenburg. 202 years after that is the most important festive event in Europe.
Favorite mythical creature? (can range from vampires to Dragons etc)
I'm sure there are more possibilities, but I ran out of salsa! I will definitely be making this again. It was super delicious, a little spicy, and a great new flavor to add to a lot of dishes. Plus, it kept for days, looking as fresh as the day I made it.
This batch has the chocolate added 5 minutes before flameout. Since I expect some loss due to the chocolate settling out, I put in 3/4 bar of 82% Scharfenberger and 3/4 bar of 41% Scharfenberger. With the chocolate in the wort already, it meant that all the equipment got an extra good cleaning to clear all the oils that stuck to everything. I skimmed the top of the wort before putting the beer into the primary, hoping to rid myself of more oils. This is still in primary almost two weeks later. There seems to be a foam at the top. It may be that more oils have gone to the top. I'll rack it by two weeks and a day regardless.
2. That's the Way it Happens All the Time
I really think you’ll enjoy it.
I will go back to Jebel Akhdar. Again and again. Yes.
But fortunately now and again a relative who lives in Bukavu would
PS Does anybody know any reliable hosting site, instead of mediafire? Do not mention rapidshare, I prefer whoever is to download not to pay a subscription.
After lunch the coach picked us and a guide up to take us on the Pendle Witch Tour. The Lancashire Witch Trials, when 20 people, of whom sixteen were women, took took place at Lancaster assizes in the autumn of 1612. No fewer than ten of these unfortunate people were found guilty at Lancaster, and hung altogether, witches were not burned in England. Eight others were acquitted; why, it is not easy to see, for the evidence appears to have been equally strong, or rather equally weak and absurd, against all.
Calliope, a gorgeous bi-racial butterfly, is looking to get back into the dating world, and so, being a modern woman, she’s taking the modern route. Hello online. Hello eHarmony.
zoned in atmosphere to explore inner thoughts. It is music that can be used
The casting in this is a little bit like ‘The Graduate’ but a little more wrong. In ‘the Graduate’, Dustin Hoffman’s Jewishness looks incredibly out of place in the Pasadena WASP surrounds. It’s not entirely explained and in many ways that film just glosses over it. In the extras on the DVD of ‘The Graduate’, there’s the discussion of casting Dustin Hoffman as “this kind of runt”. I just thought I’d mention that because in this film, you have Tilda Swinton who looks hyper Anglo and John C Reilly who looks bog Irish giving birth to and raising Ezra Miller, a Jewish boy, as their son. They just don’t look like a family; and even I can tell. It’s as if a nice gentile family supernaturally gives birth to an evil Jewish kid as punishment from God.
Regarding her digestion I will give her some Bene Bac this evening again.
The Hunger Games almost completely passed me by until all of a sudden the internet buzzed with news of the final installment, Mockingjay. I read of the cover design being leaked, the embargo apparently being as strict as a new Harry Potter or Dan Brown title, at least in the USA. Although the book was also embargoed over in the UK, no doubt with severe disciplinary action being taken against any bookseller who let it free to roam the shelves early, it wasn't until a few copies trickled into my bookshop that I realised it was part of an existing series: a dystopia, recommended on the cover blurb by Stephenie Meyer and Stephen King, that I had been staring at for maybe a year without ever really noticing.
Such a superb technique Hypnotherapy is. We can now bid goodbye to those irritating warts and boost our confidence once more.
Below is a low quality preview, which you are free to use. The high quality version is now available for download ($15) from our Mustard Seed webstore.
Rather than using a credit card that is close to being maxed out, use two or more credit cards. The interest from multiple credit cards is typically lower than a single card that is maxed out. This can help you build your score and not hurt it if you manage your credit lines the right way.
Here are buckets that I painted to resemble some of the characters. The buckets were $1 each at Micheal's.
Burning: A police officer in riot gear emerges from the debris after shooting pepper spray at masked protestors during May Day demonstrations turned violent in Seattle
"You were already supposed to know that!"
What do you want your life to look like? When you get clear, you get what you see.
So yeah.. Apparently the housework neglect has gone on for a while and I can't just blame the wedding planning.
That's nice, and makes for more pleasant working days, but drivers should never mistake cordiality with friendship. The subtext must always remain in a chauffeur's head that this is a customer/servant arrangement, nothing more. Taking liberties and making assumptions can land you in trouble. Quickly.
Why now did ASA waste its time, and make a fool out of itself over this issue?
Lappland
Overall Feeling: 5
And if it’s all about the voice, so many greats would fail. Can you imagine David Bowie managing that long note in I Will Always Love You, or a young (pre singing lessons) Madonna managing to get through any ballad on a live show without a few bum notes? Debbie Harry would be drowned out by the backing band, criticised for being “pitchy” and attract loads of internet “hatahs” for being too sexy.
She’s absolutely the fastest woman in the longer distances.)
Xxa
Our puter died is the big deal now. Somethin
ABC Letter Learning Activities
The front yard was a narrow 2.5m corridor which is hard to furnish. A second wall fronting the original living room wall was also demolished to create the new L- shaped Patio.
That’s the problem with cooking I face now that I live alone again. Because of package sizes and recipe requirements, it’s easier to cook for a family of five than one. Sure, coconut chicken curry is delicious on the first day, but five days of it for every single meal? Let’s be honest– putting it in Tupperware in the freezer happens only so, six months down the road, I can play “Oh, sweet mother of God, what WAS this?” when I defrost it to finally toss it.
Jamie Livingston took a Polaroid SX 70 “instant” photograph every day for almost 20 years – from 1979 when we 22 at Bard College in upstate New York to 1997 in New York City when he died of cancer. He took over 6500 photos and every one was personal.
“When I Am Baptized”
Sate Bandeng ( Milkfish Satay )
It was an honour to accompany you on your journey, to watch your inner strength grow, and observe you being true to yourself. Your strength is not something I see often in others, your internal strength will always be with you, it is yours and cannot be taken away. It will always be there when you need it.
His hand was laced with mine
They set-to with a will and scraped it all away -
So when I hear people talk about getting everyone to be atheist, specifically with the corollary that this will somehow remove evils from the world, I’m pretty freakin’ skeptical about the plausibility of their goals. If someone who demonstrably does evil things goes to jail and declares afterwards that they converted to religion and are a whole new person, we tend not to buy it. Why in the world would we imagine that someone religious who became atheistwouldcompletely revamp their morality?
Hugh drives the whole album on piano and vocals and is joined in the studio by the ‘Queen of New Orleans’ herself, Irma Thomas, blues piano and horns supremo Allen Toussaint, vocal legend Sir Tom Jones and in an especially momentous collaboration on ‘After You’ve Gone’ by his lifelong hero Dr. John.
Kingsolver, J. G., H. E. Hoekstra, J. M. Hoekstra, D. Berrigan, S. N. Vignieri, C. E. Hill, A. Hoang, P. Gibert, and P. Beerli. 2001. The strength of phenotypic selection in natural populations. American Naturalist 157:245-261.
Is Dad waxing nostalgic? Is he always talking about “the way things were”? If so, maybe a retro-gift is the Father’s Day gift he’ll love. Get him a candlestick telephone, a collectible framed photo showing someone he admires, a collegiate souvenir or something else to remind him — with a gentle smile — that’s he’s getting on in years.
Man. I graduate in a week and a half. Then I need to complete an internship over the summer or in the fall (since I haven’t been able to get one yet) so that I can get my diploma and start planning my life. I just want to get my foot in the door!!!
Shootin' Straight by Dan Hicks & The Hot Licks
crease ease gel is an intensive, active gel formulated to target fine lines and wrinkles around the eye area and above the lip, as well as creases in the forehead. This gel has been re-formulated with Skin Tightener ST, designed to instantly firm and smooth skin. In addition, Sodium Hyaluronate (hyaluronic acid) was added to help plump skin by increasing moisture content and reduce the appearance of fine lines and wrinkles.
Guuurl, I love 'dem shoes.
With those words I was shown a previous life time where this boy had been tortured – held down by arms and legs and cut into. It was awful! He was reverting back to these memories ALONG with the trauma of being in a strange place and having lights placed over him and being poked and prodded. My heart went out to this little guy, and I began to send love his way and kept reaffirming, “this is now, it is not then,” over and over and over again. With the help of the Angels I worked to put gentles colors around him and send him visions of being cuddled up with his Mommy, resting peacefully. It took a short while, but he calmed down.
For anyone who has been reading, or has gone back to read any of my posts, you know that Dave and I have made great progress in our lives, in our marriage. We are in a good place right now, and proactively moving forward. It has to be this way; we are leaving nothing to chance anymore. We cannot stay sedentary in any part of our lives, especially our marriage. The only way for our marriage to continue to thrive is to consistently tend to it, feeding it, cultivating it, pruning where needed, and
We repent, we turn away from the sin of masturbation.
Feel free to leave comments under the post if you want to expand on your answer!
Below is an article about 2 abortion doctors who are accused of murder in states that have laws against late-term abortion. Read the story and someone explain to me, why the women who submitted to these late-term abortions are not also charged? Also someone explain to me why killing a pregnant woman or causing her unborn child to die gets a murder charge, but abortion does not? This madness has got to stop!
Hell, it was free
Me: Uh ...
It now looks like the Trillion Dollar Coin Idea was first mentioned by Ellen Hodgson Brown. Here is an interview from December 2008 with Thom Hartmann where she discusses the idea. Also, have seen indications it might be mentioned in her book entitled: Web of Debt (1st edition, published 2007).
'Like what?' he grumbled, unconvinced.
inspiring ever, perhaps because we feel that the day has ended and we are waiting for another day gives us new hope of a new success .
Shannon Messenger graduated from the USC School of Cinematic Arts, where she learned--among other things--that she liked watching movies much better than making them. So she left LA and moved to suburbia where she would have time to eat too many cupcakes, own too many cats, and write lots and lots of books. LET THE SKY FALL is her first young adult novel, coming in Spring 2013 from Simon Pulse. She is also the author of KEEPER OF THE LOST CITIES, book one in a middle grade series launching Fall 2012 (S&S Aladdin). Find her online at shannonmessenger.com.
The most recent dress acquisition was the "I have to go to a backyard party at my husband's boss's Scarsdale mansion where the pool house is bigger and nicer than my main floor AND I have to rub elbows with all the New York City corporate wives while making sure all my children behave!" But I do love the dress now that the stress of the event is over.
“Mom, can you just give me a taste of wine before, so I’ll know.” No.
They coax me onto a platform. I get a treat for this.
Pittsburgh Pirates - Nachos Grande
Glasses per case: 6
When Should You Visit an Esthetician?
and be guided by wisdom.
In drafting the know-how section, the licensee should assure more than just the transfer of information. Show-how provisions, wherein the licensor agrees to demonstrate how to use the technology correctly, are also vital.
“It was a really fun thing to figure out,” she said. “And it was literally my first introduction to glass on a design level.
But the most important thing was seeing how happy and engaged the kids are. We hear that back in London there is tension and discord amongst our former neighbours surrounding things that have been said in the playground and whether people’s children are getting sufficient attention at the school. The urban competition that we weren’t conscious of when we lived there is sharply vivid from a distance. There is none of that politics here in the Chew Valley, well, not the bit we live in. There is just a wonderful sense of community, of helping one another and of friendship. All values we want our children to learn as part of their rule book for life.
Midway on that endless descent, a stroller halted him, but before he could jump around it, his eyes fell on her.
Such views are widely shared. “What we are really not that good at is the longer-term management,” says Rudd. “Patients come into hospital, get into the stroke units, but then actually spend most of their time sitting around not really having very much happening to them. There is, I think, evidence of a link between the intensity of therapy and the speed of recovery people make, so we have to think about how we get more therapy for people without necessarily saying we need staff.”
My words had left me, and now sorrow danced with the panic.
Oliver feels the coming pangs of death;
Whedon also excels here with the new characters of Black Widow and Hawkeye. I call Widow a new character because I was never happy with the way she was uncomfortably shoehorned into Iron Man 2 and given basically nothing to do; Whedon has to reinvent her here. Scarlett Johansson gets to play a character--and quite well, actually, reminding me of why I used to think Scarlett Johansson was a capable actress. She's actually got layers; she's neither a superwoman nor the token non-powered character. (Good fight scenes, too; even though she's of course packed into a tight outfit, she doesn't have any of the silly pole-dancing martial arts of her previous appearance.) Jeremy Renner is a likable Hawkeye, and Whedon pulls a good trick by putting Hawkeye in a situation for the first half of the movie that not only pays homage to Hawkeye's origins as a villain in the Marvel Universe, but also gives us an introduction to a character we don't really know yet. He makes you forget just how implausible an archer would be in this world of monsters, magic, aliens, and high tech espionage--and to the extent you remember, you don't really care because the movie thinks it's fun. (And boy have these movies found a great way to get over what seemed a few years ago the insurmountable problem of mixing magic and fantasy with science fiction.) The easy, natural chemistry Renner and Johansson have is one of the movie's many treats.
XL: “It’s an honor really. I’m very proud of being mentioned alongside Linkin Park when people talk about Rap/Rock. When it’s all said and done, I want Xtatic Line to be remembered as one of the biggest acts that represented the genre. As far as pressure goes, I don’t do music to live up to others standards. I don’t make music and then go compare it to someone else’s work to determine if it’s good or not. I don’t put that kind of pressure on me because I don’t believe in that. So being compared to LP is fine due to the fact that I’m not trying to fill their shoes or live up to their name. I work on what I think would be interesting to try and create, and as long as I keep doing that, I’ll feel no exterior pressure.”
When their experiment was getting started, the Heartland Institute was thinking about a few more people who should be at future billboards of this kind: Charles Manson, a mass murderer, Fidel Castro, a tyrant, Osama bin Laden, the late emperor of all terrorists, and James Lee who took hostages in the Discovery Channel two years ago.
And so it is.
(The title is taken from one of my favorite poets, e.e.cummings. I highly recommend his collected works for the poet enthusiasts out there!)
Given good fertility, Orchardgrass will produce large quantities of Digestible Dry Matter (DDM) while simultaneously providing quality nutrition and energy.
Cicero smiled, but faintly. “Another point of interest - the lighting of the braziers. You told me you last saw the dead slave two hours ago, lighting the braziers, but I clearly remarked to myself the flames were dim - thus lit around 5 hours ago.”
It was at that time yesterday, as I was in the ferocity of engagement that comes with the kids needing snacks, help with homework, and rides to practices, that M escaped the commotion by doing maintenance outside in the yard. I was pleased because our lack of curb appeal was an item of embarrassment for my 13 year old. What was more, it was good to see him going—plowing through months of depression with fervor and ease. He seemed to possess the joy of a child outside for the first time since the thaw of winter.
Sorry I didn't get to post anything for last week's Artful Thursday, I was so tied up with attempting to get everything ready for The Mad Tea Jamboree! Thanks so all of you who stopped by and enjoyed some good food and entertainment. I'm STILL trying to make my way through the long-list of party-goers. There were so many wonderful parties to go to this year. And of course, the Queen herself, Ms Vanessa, truly out-did herself! She is an amazing woman with an endless supply of imagination!
In any case, the Thing itself is very informative about Social Networking, and specifically why Archives should be looking into establishing a presence on Facebook, MySpace, etc. (though I am not sure that MySpace retains its relevance in 2012). I mostly use Facebook myself for personal communications, but the UWM Libraries have a dedicated Facebook page which fulfills many of the functions mentioned here, and I do belong to a number of Facebook groups which discuss Archival and Records Management concerns. I do have to wonder how effective marketing by Libraries and Archives on Facebook etc. is sometimes– many, many followers are undoubtedly Librarians/Archivists themselves. Then again, the UWM Libraries has 790 followers, and there are certainly fewer than 790 librarians working here, so my cynicism may be showing.
Written By: R.S. Allen, Joseph Barbera, Harvey Bullock, Warren Foster, William Hanna, Alex Lovy
1 packet ranch dressing mix
I hope you all had a wonderful Mother's Day weekend! We had such a blast with both of our families and it was nonstop. One of these days we'll get to see some friends while we're in town. It was yet another busy weekend! We spent yesterday with my family. We had a nice Mother's Day lunch and then we got to talk to my little brother via Skype, who is serving a full time mission in Australia for our church. We got to talk to him for an hour and a half! It was so fun! He's been out for two months now.
The collaboration between Cage and Herzog in BL2 had a reckless, exhilarating momentum, the Lynch-Herzog collaboration doesn't have immediacy, perhaps as it neglects the 'glue' of normal 'strong' grounding characters like Eva Mendez's prostitute, or a Lynchian heroine like Naomi Watts or Laura Dern. Willem Dafoe tries to be grounded as the homicide detective on the scene, but Dafoe will never be able to play 'grounded' --the more he tries, the creepier he gets --and I mean that as a compliment. He's too nice and sweet a soul to play one on TV. He's warmer when he's colder.
Loss of XV230 avoidable
Rudy and I have scrapped the idea for a condo. We realized that there’s no way we’re going to be able to come up with the money that we’ll need by January and it’s probably not the best idea to pick the place we’d like to live permanently without living there on a temporary basis for a bit. Basically, Rudy wants to work about an hour and a half away from where I’m living now. Because of my mom’s health, I can’t move to the halfway point because my parents depend on me to help out with my mom’s stuff and I have to be able to make it to her hospital at the drop of a hat. So we compromised with a half hour commute to my work and my parents for me and an hour for Rudy. I know it doesn’t sound like much of a compromise but Rudy travels a lot for work and will probably be closer on most days and could potentially be further on other days, but that doesn’t matter where we live. And he’ll probably only be with that company for another two or three years and then he’ll most likely move on to bigger and better things. So we’re sticking to our living near Boston plan. It’s just going to be a nasty commute for a while. So rather than commit to such a nasty commute for three or four years by buying, we’re thinking about renting for a year. Actually, we’re doing it more so that I can get used to living away from home and used to the drive to see my parents and then we’ll probably move closer to where Rudy works. But we’re going to wait and see how this all works out. It feels good to get that settled. We’re still actively saving for a down payment and we’ll get to our goal before our lease is up (assuming we end up with a year’s lease) so we’ll really be able to figure out what we want and we’ll probably get a mortgage. I hope. And now that I’ve lost most of my readers with this boring stuff, on to something else!
I would give anything for Cameron to regain his brain function but good has come out of bad. As a family we are hugely appreciative of the little things in life and we rejoice the smallest of achievements. Cameron is incredibly loving and caring and is focused on the important things in life - those he loves and love him. He is not materialistic and has lead us to the same path. We have learnt a lot of life lessons through Cameron and that was something we didn't foresee when we sat beside our dying child fifteen years ago.
The trouble with his closing statement there is that it’s the equivalent of saying “If the laws of motion describe my car as it travels both backwards and forwards, then they really don’t describe anything.”
I'd wrapped a small gift for Tracey and Sandi as a thanks for all their hard work during the year. Yeah, I do a little bit with the emails and web site, but between them, the admin - paying the bills et al - gets done without any fuss, so I felt it was only right to pass on a note of thanks. Sophie, the wee minx, surprised me with a card and small pressie (Ed: I wonder what it is?) which was both very nice and very unexpected. Then Amy did the same and I felt thoroughly spoilt and very pleased at the same time.
While Ron Paul who is constantly telling us, when he gets a chance in the media, what our government is doing behind closed doors. What we can expect our future situations to look like, who is working for who and so on. His track record in congress makes him stand alone in an arena of greedy and misguided fools. He would never bow to a foreign king, try to shake the Queen’s hand, give Mexican drug cartels weapons while suing the people of Arizona at the same time nor will Ron Paul ever apologize to any other country for America’s actions in the past, present or future. Ron Paul will never lead us to into an undeclared and un necessary war over money, religion or resources. He always has and always will be for the people, the constitution and for America.
This time, when his eyes met Taslin's, there was no teasing, no pretended humanity. Just the hard focus of desperation. She reached out a hand to him, and he grabbed it almost without thinking. The Axtli boiled into the croft, black fog that brought with it a wrenching sense of nausea. Then, suddenly, falling, tumbling, through where the floor should have been, and something caught him across the belly, flipping him over. Dora screamed in pain, drowning out Taslin's curse, and there was darkness.
My sex jumps, pulses
Here is the deepest secret no one knows.
Worst of all though (the one we rarely even whisper) is you only have so much bowel. Mr Gaunt-Looking-Surgeon reminded me, in that matter-of-fact way that surgeons do, that I don't have much left. You lot have about 4 metres, I'm down to 1.5. Continuing his mechanical appraisal, he reminded me that you need at least a metre to survive. Odd how surgeons leave statements like that hanging, as though I could somehow stop frivolously wasting bowel.
There are no easy plans/charts/graphs or theory’s that painstakingly describe how to motivate you, none. So let’s put on our paleo cliche faces for a moment and ask a few questions that most of us should relate to:
One commentator on Sikhism and Islam interestingly claims that relations between Sikhs and Muslims are worse in the UK than in India and Pakistan. He tells us that many Indian Sikhs visit historical gurudwaras in the Punjab, Pakistan. Likewise, many Pakistani Muslims visit Indian Islamic shrines or sports events in India. However, he also says that there are ‘tensions’ in the UK between Sikhs and Muslims. Specifically, there are many cases of Sikhs being ‘forced to convert to Islam’ here in the UK. From my own knowledge, there is the problem of Muslim men ‘grooming’ Sikh girls in order to have sexual relations with them or turn them into virtual or actual prostitutes.
On the trust I had depended
Happy Halloween Week!
Do I have any readers in beta already with a priest copied over? Has this hit as a live spell in the beta? Is it cool?
It's a new era of Valentine's Days for us.
He set up a Facebook page, “Dave, The Gratitude Guy.” He filmed a YouTube video on gratefulness with the help of friends he calls his “grat pack.” On Jan. 1, 2011, he began writing a yearlong gratitude blog: mygratitudelife.com.
Two years ago, I thought I’d found somewhere to go in Zambia, but I was told to find a travel companion and again this jarred with me. I was strangely relieved, when this particular plan fell through having instinctively always felt that this was something I had to do on my own. Earlier this year, I went through a process of intense self doubt about this deep held desire of mine. My trip had not happened so far, I’d talked about it for years and it still hadn’t manifested, my friends badgered me, my inner voice told me off for postponing it so long. I felt my lifelong dream was a mirage, and that I was never going to see it for real. I’d left it too long…
In spite of all these issues, I still rank this book pretty highly. It’s snappy, breezy and does bring great action and drama. The key is to take it as it is: YA fiction meant to set-up a final book while appealing to teenagers. Embrace it as a fun vacation/transit read, and it’s worth the time.
and wrote about their gotcha days.
Saturday was the meeting of the Mid Essex Guild of Spinners and Weavers. Somehow I find myself in possession of a spinning wheel, without being able to spin. I am poring over Sue Macniven's You-Tube videos, and have learned a lot already.
Reader Brad, currently residing in my old Northside Chicago stomping grounds, just helped me significantly with this quest. His generosity in our newly completed trade also has me adding another mini-goal to this set: Complete the Vintage Chrome insert collection.
I know those words in my headline are quoted from the lyrics to Bruce Springsteen‘s song Jackson Cage. After finishing the post below I happened to think of this song and those words in particular. To me the song is about being or feeling trapped in a life with no or few options and to not feel very good about that life while it still remains all you’ve got. This I relate to my own life where I often feel that I am my own worst enemy.
For the card I just cut a couple strips of patterned paper and attached them to the front of the card. I stamped the mixer on the card and on a piece of patterned paper, then cut it out and attached it to the card with pop dots. I stamped the sentiment on the bottom (unfortunately I smeared it a bit). Then I added some machine stitching and attached the whole thing to a red cardstock base.
*I was given a free copy of this book in exchange for my honest review.*
Anyway after spending a very awkward 5 minutes or so going through potential jobs we relise there are none and make an appointment for the end of the month. Hopefully it will be a much happier affair and luckily for her I dont hold a grudge. Personally, I think its the start of somthing special!
Hope this helps you all. Let me know how you get on when starting your own cake mix as I haven't tired this. I have only worked from a mixture that was given to me.
arms full, they fell all around, all around,
An old college classmate emailed this to me the other day. I wanted to share. I realize some of my readers might be over 30, but that's really not the point.
The work of Bertien van Manen was in numerous solo and group exhibitions including the Museum of Modern Art (New York), The Photographers Gallery (London) and Photo Museum Winterthur. Her work is included in major international collections such as Stedelijk Museum (Amsterdam), Rijksmuseum (Amsterdam), The Museum of Modern Art (New York), The Metropolitan Museum of Art (New York), Maison Européenne de la Photographie (Paris) and The Metropolitan Museum of Photographie (Tokyo). Bertien van Manen lives and works in Amsterdam.
By the Blood of Jesus Christ, I am now put right with God! Amen!
The lines quoted at the beginning of the post constitute the chorus of "Sixteen Tons," and refer to the peculair economic system that prevailed in many coal-mining towns back when the song was written. The miners weren't paid in cash, but in "scrip." Scrip was not legal tender, but could only be spent by the miners and their families at company stores -- the coal companies operated the general stores in mining towns -- or to pay the rent for the company-owned housing where they lived.
But when I wear the dress, I'll think of the fond memories.
Starting out as a new YA book blogger is a ton of fun. You meet a bunch of new people who all share in your passion for YA books, you become a part of a friendly community, and you're continually exposed to wonderful new books.
So I took the best elements from her sauce, as well as the best from another one of my favorites (Pappy V's) and merged them into my own glorious creation.
“There is One Light that stretches throughout with abiding reach
By Mister Fox of the Green Arrow Forum.
I found this fascinating in that our teaching styles were quite different. We sometimes sat in on each others classes. Sometimes this was to learn a program we didn’t know. In large classes, the program provided “teaching assistants.” Once in a while one of the full instructors would help out as a TA.
1 brook
moved onto lacemaking, cross stitching and have dabbled in tatting. The
I am all about making traditions and having fun for Christmas, but here is my advice to all you young moms: if you start a tradition, it will be hard to stop, so think carefully and choose wisely!
2) How can you become more inclusive? How can you share your generosity and caring with more people? On the other side of the coin, how can you share more with your loved ones?
I’ve actually learned quite a bit this week. Mostly about how to govern the world in different ways. Karl Marx and Immanuel Kant plays both vital roles in my learning curve.
so my parents and i tore down the beautiful gazebo that was original to our house.
Friday morning my mom got married.
We also talked about what we need to do with her if she is still denied the last dose of Synagis (other than the common sense things, which we've been doing all along even with the shots). We have a list of a few different symptoms to watch out for that could indicate she picked up RSV somewhere along the line.
Do you need internalization in a novel? Yes! But it has its place. Most internalization will be part of what is known as the sequel. Sequels transpire as a direct reaction to a scene. When a writer begins the novel with the sequel, that is a huge warning that, again, the writer is weak when it comes to structure. There is a definite purpose for reflection, but kicking off the action is not one of them.
We celebrate the Lord’s Supper twice a month at Pacific Union. The origins of Communion is rooted in the Passover meal (seder). Jesus takes an old familiar ritual and gives it new meaning. The unleavened bread of the Passover harkened back to the suddenness of Israel’s freedom that came so quickly there was no time for the bread to rise. Yeast also represented sin in the Jewish mind, so unleavened bread symbolized something that was sin-free. What new meaning does Jesus give the unleavened bread of the Passover? During the Passover meal, four cups commemorating the deliverance of Israel were drunk. Jesus takes one of these cups. What new meaning does Jesus give to the cups of Passover?
Transaction Binding=Implicit Unbind;
CB: Any photographers you admire in the business?
“Oh wow. You a baaa-baaa-gaaah!” See, I have a literary crush on Mr. Green. His writing is brilliant and his wit shines brightly through in his novels. After my initial fangirl moment, I’d try to gather myself and formulate something intelligent to say. Try.
I bring these things up, because even for the most dominant of athletes the path to gold can be tenuous, and while Bolt was certainly more than dominant in Beijing, the landscape for 2012 has already changed dramatically.
Upholstered bench from Craigslist
This isn’t the first time we’ve come across sleep-depriving strange noises. But they’re usually identifiable. Sometimes, it’s the cats. Other times it’s thunder or fireworks. So, our natural response is to roll our eyes, (just a little), and ask, “What did you hear?”
Genesis 19: 1-28
When Pia O'Brian's best friend dies, Pia expects to inherit her cherished cat. Instead, the woman leaves Pia three frozen embryos. With a disastrous track record in the romance department and the parenting skills of a hamster, Pia doesn't think she's meant for motherhood. But determined to do the right thing, Pia decides to become a single mother. Only to meet a gorgeous, sexy hunk the very same day.
How about your kid? Does she remember the time you flipped out when she pushed the boundaries too far? Does he remember the time you forgot to bring something he needed for school? Do they seem to forget things you think are important but don't let you forget the time you made a mistake? What do you wish your kid would just forget already?
Starting with long edge, roll up dough, pinch seams to seal and place onto baking sheet.
Takashi Miike, Audition
If the person becomes intensely fearful or worse still terrified, which is most likely, then the person’s heart will beat extremely fast and the blood pressure will rise to an extremely high level. And again a coping habit may come into play. If it is an EMCM it can have a very significant additive effect because it will help the person become unaware of the extremely unpleasant ideas, and possibly very quickly but it will be a very hefty price because their blood pressure will soar to a very unnaturally high level. Such high blood pressure will have a devastating effect if the area is already weaken by an immune reaction.
She grabs on tight as she lets me know,
rushonrock: Have any musical artists had a big impact on your life?
Though we cannot do it on our own,
Hubs also came home from a work trip out of town with a gift. He can be thoughtful when he wants. I appreciate all he does for our household. I got a new 'bear claw' back scratcher, which is an inside joke, but it is so cute. He used it to avoid getting out of bed to turn off the light on his side, so see it already came in handy! Everyone should have a 'bear' around.
Go Tigers.
And of course I have studied Mary McDonalds work, well before buying and absorbing every page of her book a year ago. In this room, she used modern Barcelona chairs and ghost chairs ... contemporary but traditional ... LOVE!
For stamping the little 'viruses' I used Zoya Veruschka and one of old BM plates.
In a place you only dream of, where your soul is always free
The divine balsam flows.
There's so many interconnected strands you can pull from this article, forgive me. Let's get back to it:
Standing at any vantage point in the medieval walled city of Conwy, one can see the 13th century castle, originally built by King Edward I. By looking out onto its ramparts and towers, it’s easy to see why Conwy was an important sea port for England.
It just doesn't ring my bell. There are those for which it works, and those who claim to believe it just as presented in certain churches, but there are those whose anger is too quick and heated at any who may not agree. That makes me think they do not believe and that scares them so they become angry zealots, lest their peers, or maybe even Jesus, see the lack of faith in their hearts.
Stand up Trinidad ans Tobago!
With regard to Inward Baptism we may point out that we have strong ground for inferring that God has a provisional economy of grace for our little ones, resulting, at any rate in certain cases, in their regeneration, and thus in their final salvation, if they die in infancy. Why then should not the Christian parent plead that this economy of grace may be extended to his child, inasmuch as it is needed, as for death so also for the perils of continued life; and why should he not prove the faith of his prayer by submitting his child to the ordinance, which is the means whereby this grace of regeneration is normally received? In such a case, whatever benefit may be granted through the ordinance by Him who sees the faith of those who bear the helpless infant and lay him at the Master’s feet, that benefit must needs be provisional in its character. The condition on which the enjoyment of the new life is dependent, i.e. faith in the Life-giver, cannot be evaded or dispensed with; and if special adaptations of divine grace to the case of helpless infancy are not met by such a repentance as forsakes sin, and such a faith as steadfastly believes the specific promise of God made in the sacrament, all such benefits must needs be forfeited.
Liam McEneaney
Duke Ellington & his Orch - Satin doll (20-03-1958)
Williams has been paired with many bands on recordings in recent years. But with The Goldstars, there’s a real chemistry that’s not always apparent with other backup bands.
Hope you are having a great 1st week of 2012!
Third cup of coffee, prepared the same way, and finishing up the last third of the splenda packet. George’s eyes are moving and now he is staring at me. “Why do you have a computer if you don’t even know how to use it. Why don’t you know how to click things. Are you an idiot. Yeah, you are. You killed my brother.”
“I’m done anyway”, Denise replied rolling her eyes before slumping herself on her bed.
It makes me realize how aware I must be in order, that my thoughts do not take me directly into fear.
I felt the need to shop at the nearest Publix!
The Nail Magic and Nail Envy trial.. Mixed views on that, again, a more detailed post to come on that front.
However, it was discouraging in the sense that I had no idea how I placed. Whether the judges took one look at my proposal and threw it out, whether they began reading and dismissed it, or whether it held its own and was seriously considered. I told the Lord how difficult it was not knowing what stage my work is at, not knowing if it's in good shape for publishers or whether it still needs a lot of work.
5- Waiting Phase One
Well, no rain as they had forecast, instead, we’re getting snow. It isn’t sticking on the ground of course, but when I woke up, it looked as if I were looking into a snow globe when I looked out the window. It will be a winter parka with the camera tucked safely inside kind of day today.
Oh dear. When the accountants finally presented their report the news wasn't good. There was an £80,000-odd hole in the accountants. Creditors wouldn't be getting 20 shillings in the £.
They agree and we get up to open the door.
“Generally speaking, the most miserable people I know are those who are obsessed with themselves; the happiest people I know are those who lose themselves in the service of others...By and large, I have come to see that if we complain about life, it is because we are thinking only of ourselves.” President Gordon B. Hinckley
Do you often imagine what if I could relive those magical moments when my team won the play cricket games online to know the best cricket games online of your favorite ex cricketer. You can add a new dimension to their favorite team, but one can store these cricket portals also give out all cricket related queries and doubts will be is a game of cricket wallpapers as world cup or any controversy that may have taken place in the test cricket games online in form of hearing cricket analysis becomes a matter of choice for such people, but they always manage to instill confidence and self esteem in cricketer. The cricketer develops determination to achieve their aims. They don't get much time to spend with their audios, then cricket podcast and preserving the natwest cricket games online as long as you want.
Luke 1:26-28, 31
The morning after our arrival, we wake up and see that it has rained and it is very overcast!
Tom once showed her how to stroke a young Tiger, flipped on its back, allowing it to slip into a dreamlike state called tonic immobility–like in a dream world where the lion might lie down with the lamb. It did not flinch when she stroked it. Almost purred like a cat.
1. please leave an message under this post
One of the songs from the album's second disc, "Beat Em" is a song that Quarashi had planned to release on the 2002 album "Jinx", but didn't finish it in time to fully produce it for the album. Quarashi has uploaded the song to Soundcloud for fans to listen to and have a preview of the album. Listen to "Beat Em:, from the upcoming album "Anthology", here:
Paul Allen: Why are their copies of the style section all over the place, d-do you have a dog? A little chow or something?
Instead, we are left not with searches for truth, but for what people want to hear. I believe this is only part of a disturbing trend on college campuses towards the stifling of dissent. SFSU students faced disciplinary action for flag-burning. Check out the news at FIRE, a college free speech advocacy group, for many other instances.
(Edited for fresh linkage!)
Today my daughter gave me a makeover while I lay stretched out in the recliner.
Hair Piece: Thirty One, free hostess gift
The shirts are $20 and the shipping is FREE!
American History
﻿﻿﻿What a weekend! I have been hunkered down in the studio for two days. Yesterday, I received the shipment of chain and clasps I was waiting for, so I worked on finishing up more of the holiday collection, including these gorgeous (if I do say so myself) Scottish Tartan Necklaces. worked on the Faux Bone and Ivory tutorial. The publish date is near, though, my patient friends.
87. Richard Snow & The In Laws-Am I Really That Boring? (Valley)
Hugh Jackman is so hot. I like Nicole Kidmans hair and necklace, but the dress is not my cup of tea. Well maybe a cup of green tea, I don't like that.
with two images of one regular Mike Vick, quarterback of the Philadelphia Eagles, alonside one of a caucasian Mike Vick.
Two concerns arose; one, will the jalabiyas be long enough? One thing that had drawn me to this site was at some point in the past they listed all the lengths as 60″. I have a hard time finding full-length garments, even on sites selling abayas, so I was concerned that they might have shortened since this info was no longer posted. The customer service, however, assured me that all the sizes were still 60″ in length. To those who may say this is too long, I say, try it first . I actually wondered if it might be a little long on me (I typically order abayas slightly shorter than that) but as it turned out, maybe because of the cut, it was exactly right, just brushing the top of my foot. In fact, if I wore heels this might be considered a little short and could sustain another inch or two! I’m 5’9″, and it was not tripping me in bare feet. In shoes, I needed pants underneath when walking (or tall socks, I suppose). Also Muslimah in Reverie made the suggestion in her review, in cases where the garment was too long, of gathering it up with a pin on one side, which I think would look great (on me this would make it too short though). Basically someone several inches shorter than me could easily pull off this length in these particular garments, and shorter than that could pin, wear a sash which allows the waist to be tucked up a little more, or get it hemmed (not difficult, I’ve hemmed a number of garments at home in fact, and tailors/dry cleaners will also often offer this service at low cost). On the other hand if it’s too short for you at 60″, I can only say, I feel your pain: I have run into this on many sites.
had and the ones we will have...
Jaume Balagueró
I'm a spanko as you probably know.
To style your new haircut, you'll need several things. Probably the most important is a flat iron. Female emo hairstyles are pretty much all straight. If you don't have a flat iron, you can achieve straightening your hair by blow drying it straight using a paddle brush. This takes longer, but will ultimately give you the same result.
I needed to fill this empty space I
I made Cookham meadows on time yesterday.
I used to work as a Dental Receptionist and Office Manager until I got ill in my late 30's.
She had trusted Hayden, even fallen for him, and now he and his brother Luke were taking her deeper and deeper into the Bayou. Why had two of her classmates, the mysterious Boudreaux brothers, kidnapped her?
- when the prisoners were finally placed in crammed, hot railroad cars the men racked by dysentery relieved themselves on other prisoners
I used to live for the satisfaction of only one person, and that person was myself. I recall being a rather self-confident child, and while I showed a preference to play by myself (I can recall incidences even from elementary school), I wasn’t afraid of initiating. I most certainly didn’t care about what others thought (I remember telling my dad this), or at least I didn’t think I cared.
There are many paid survey companies will pay you for your opinions, to review their websites or to try their new products.
6. “THE SPIRIT” + THE QUESTION + MR. A
Syrin startled both of them, "Hardly. I just didn't want to talk to you, just as I don't want to now."
In 1999 I went to visit her for the first time (alone), and this being my first trip overseas (outside Africa), I was amazed to see how carefree life was in Holland. She lives in a beautiful and clean village just outside Utrecht, where kids run in the streets, toys and bicycles are left outside over night without being stolen.
The BBC was very enthusiastic in its reporting on the particularly gruesome and racist murder of a black American in Texas called James Byrd, but if you go to the BBC website and search for any of the names of the white victims in the Wichita Massacre or the Knoxville Horror, you will find not a single word, not a single acknowledgement of the two greatest racial crimes committed in America in the last century. Why the inexplicable double standards, which seem utterly dependent on skin colour?
Copy editor: Katie Schwing
I was recently involved in a situation that resulted in a young birthday boy being charged with sexual assault at a party. Prior to this event, I warned the host parents to control alcohol and organise responsible adults to help manage the party.
Wits and swords are as straws against the wisdom of the Darkness…
Salt and gravel behind the Town Garage.
I’ll end with this. “Lord of Misrule” was a gift, and though the book wasn’t awesome, it kept my attention, got me thinking, and was generally a good read. You don’t always hit a bulls-eye when you give a book as a gift, so it is a risk. I believe it is always a risk worth taking. If you read a book jacket and you think for a even just a moment about whether a friend may like the book, then through that simple act you are demonstrating you are a good friend.
The Name Game swap miniquilt that I made for Wendy has arrived in Queensland, so I now show what I made. Wendy’s blog name is Sugar Lane Quilts. I was going to make something sweet, and then I read Wendy’s blog where she talks about how much they love living in Queensland, where they grow sugarcane and have lovely beaches. So I went with that theme. I was super pleased with how this turned out.
“Proposed Washington State Income Tax Not Deductible, Attorney General Says”
some cheddar cheese
“Now listen to me. I will give you counsel, and God be with you!” (v.19)
AREA : constellation size or area, in square degrees
The Christmas Song (Chestnuts Roasting On An Open Fire)
They fooled me. The Hungarian Carrot pepper is hotter than a Serrano, not as hot as a Habañero. But plenty hot enough for this gabacha. The plant produced a bounty, so I have quite a few. Any takers? I'll pick some for you.
With so many beautiful fish in this pet store, every time I visit there, I crave many new species, which I can`t have for the moment and I dream of a few, which I can never have. Like for example arowana or silver shark, both of them really big fish, which require a huge fish tank. Nevertheless I always have a great time there.
If you need the storage but are looking for something that will fit within your student or first-time-buyer budget, don’t forget about Ikea. The Oppdal bed frame and headboard offers both open and drawer storage for around $500.
I really hope she'll get arrested and punished for what she has done. May God give her the right punishment for all the bad she has done to the baby (and maybe the little girl too). Amen.
Luthien seems to like them!
Original Mario Bros affair and fireworks
So, in honor of that, I've made a little list of a few things you can do to make the most of Christmas.
When we sow, let the sky be clear with calm breezes,
My cousin and her friends decided to go to Oasis, which is a really spiffy and upbeat bubble tea cafe. The place didn’t close til 2 AM. We hung out for a while played 13, and later on one of my cousins friends called her other friends to come too. This kind of ruins my plan of leaving even before the place closes. Once we finally left, it had been 2 and my cousins drove me home hastily (and safely).
Does anyone else have an obsession with Japanese sewing books? I just adore the patterns and photos and have based most of my designs for 'Snowpea' on them. I am so glad that they have just started to publish a few of them in English.
What can you tell us about It's Spring?
I’d looked at using iCal on my server, but it was just too hard to sync things with my laptop at home and my iPhone, without converting to MobileMe and whatever else Apple wanted me to use.
- gas (wolfgang voigt) - nah und fern (gas, zauberberg, königsforst, and pop) - kompakt - 2008
Elizabeth: I write historical fiction I guess because from childhood I’ve always read biographies of historical figures and later historical fiction. It’s what I am drawn to.
In a debate he completed dominated Allison Hunter who had to ask him if what she was saying was right!
John W. Farrell, 41, Basking Ridge, N.J.
The fifth strand of DNA is held by the sodalite crystal and vibrates to the number three and this one impacts immensely on your throat chakra. This is to do with communication. People who are teachers, people who are to bring about change through communication are truly activating their fifth strand of DNA like there is no tomorrow. It is becoming a very strong strand, because as you move out of the old age of limitation, of poverty consciousness, of victim consciousness, conditional love and lust consciousness, the throat chakra is becoming more active. Because people need to learn to say what they mean and mean what they say. To lead by example by thought, action and word. And this is what the fifth strand of DNA is all about.
Wednesday was rushed. I had made a meal plan the night we arrived home, but I was at school all day until almost 4pm. R, since the rabbinical school has Sukkot break, got the apartment ready for the holiday and went grocery shopping. With me still fighting the end of my cold and the weather report in NYC being pretty cold and damp, we planned to eat most of our meals indoors, hopefully after saying kiddush in the Sukkah at synagogue. We didn’t have guests or invitations.
Prior to coming here, I knew diddly-squat about Romania except that there was a very famous Romanian gymnast, Nadia Comăneci, who was the first to ever receive a perfect 10 at the 1976 Summer Olympics. I was born in 1977 and had vague recollections of the 1980 Olympics from watching TV but I think at that time, my mother thought I might take up gymnastics and qualify for the Olympics. Yes, you may start guffawing now. HAHAHA.
As a fit fanatic, I tried many things to keep in shape, and this is what I found out.
Bonjour my fellow people :) It is indeed the day of pay tomorrow I CANT WAIT...Actually why am I getting excited, I won't spend my money, infact that is going to be saved...Hmm excitement over with then :O
The Upsetters - Dub Dat
"Oh, no." She laughed at what was probably a common misunderstanding. "Those are the foods you're supposed to avoid." She handed me a much smaller, two-page packet. "These are the foods you can eat."
Rules: A somewhat tweaked version of RQ2, contact me and I'll send you the details.
Candidate: Julia Parrish
I would like to give my boy a name but Codie suddenly isn't sure if that's the name he wants. So while he thinks some more about it, I guess he will just be baby boy for now. We had never entertained the idea of ever having to give another child a name. With Jack we we knew, I knew, long before he was conceived who he was and what his name would be.
Nonetheless, here are some of the things that Catie and I made with felt.
we is starting all over again but Mom knows how to
Wind fluttered outside the now-hidden bower,
105. Mesrine: Public Enemy Number 1 * ^
It’s Monday folks, Mt D’or still vex about Atiba Duncan’s murder and Shoppin Toppin have to answer questions before her party for abusing the Govt credit card. The week now start…..the game of thrones continues!
Sorry pal, you will have to get your own fish. That’s our dinner.
While on maternity leave I decided that I wanted to learn how to cook. I could no longer use the excuse of not having enough time as I am now home all day.
I cut down a bit of bench to mount a temporary wedging table. Much of the remaining stuff is mine, destined for my flat, but.... um
In India, we are also an explosion of Indian mythology-inspired character on Indian animation scene with Chhota Bheem, Krishna, Ganesha, Hanuman, Kumbh-Karan, etc.. Among all these characters, Chhota Bheem, by far the most loved character by young kids in India today.
To break
This leads to today’s philosophical topic. Those who are close-minded get left behind. We put ourselves in theoretical boxes, but many times it’s out of fear. Parents are their children’s knowledge filters. Does it benefit us to shelter our children or does it stifle their growth? Are children who are exposed to a lot ruined, or are they just wiser?
Ie peux à treſ-juſte titre appeller l'Ananas, le Roy des fruits, parce qu'il eſt le plus beau, & le meilleur de tous ceux qui ſont ſur la terre. C'eſt ſans doute pour cette raiſon, que le Roy des Roys luy a mis une couronne ſur la teſte, qui eſt comme une marque eſſentielle de ſa Royauté, puis qu'à la cheute du père, il produit un ieune Roy qui luy ſuccede en toutes ſes admirables qualitez : … (p. 127)
You can tell that I had a wonderful Christmas. Sigh..I need to get myself alot more Christmas spirit.
We are an offering of worship to our King
The landlady, Andrea, is an interesting character and manages to be creepy even though she's mostly described as a harmless old lady.
Oshiomhole in his quest for re-
Large crowds of people, many in the yellow colours of the reform movement, gathered at various points around Kuala Lumpur, defying a ban on holding the rally at Independence Square.
We move on to more enjoyable activities. Master remarks that I am already "sloshing" wet, I am so ready for His touch.We start off quickly, and then slowly just enjoy each other. It is good to be together again, and to know I am where I belong.
Our plan is to bring her to the ER this morning for labs and cultures. If her temperature is on the rise or lab work is indicating infection then we will stay and start treating her as if she has an infection until things prove otherwise.
The chocolate bread pudding, which I snitched a taste of from Alex, is still shamefully rich and deliciously spongy. The goat cheese cheesecake was a little too hoof-y for me, but Nick seemed to enjoy it plenty. Me, I got to sample the weekly special: chocolate truffle cake with praline crunch, and the praline crunch made the dessert.
E:i would like to try smore rice krispie treats
“Nothing is wrong.”
Nova - Ivory Size 6
“Yes!! But, I see it so differently now! So many people are pressured by the outside world to look a certain way and that’s ALL they are thinking about! But, what I’ve noticed in myself is that I never thought about how I wanted to feel! I would keep going until I couldn’t go any further. I was So exhausted, miserable, unsatisfied and unhappy!”
We left Bergen at 8am and took a pretty standard train to the small ski town of Voss. Here we boarded a bus for a scenic drive to Gudvangen. Since we were traveling on very snowy winter roads we bypassed the 22 some odd hairpin turns that the old highway has and arrived at the mouth of the Nærøyfjord in just under an hour. We passed our first of many frozen waterfalls we would see that day, they amazed me! And then we pulled up to this:
As soon as the 20th minute it looked as if the Barcelona strangle hold had already started to tighten, the Chelsea players looked tired, sluggish, and I could not see how they were going to get the ball back. Time after time the ball got slipped through the Chelsea ranks and provided yet another chance on goal, but it just wasn’t going to go in.
Recently, I called my daughter to see what she was doing on her day off. She was crocheting a granny aquare afghan. Surprised, I asked her how she knew how, because I had taught her basic crocheting, but never how to make granny squares. "YouTube," she answered. "They have videos about how to do anything!" I couldn't help but feel a little pride. As soon as I become a grandmother, I'll teach her to smock!
At present the position of the EPO is unclear on the novelty of medical uses claims where the patient group that is treated overlaps with that treated by a known therapy. For example if it is found that patients with certain biomarkers are particularly receptive to treatment with a known cancer drug, it is unclear whether a medical use referring to the treatment of patients with the biomarker will be deemed to be novel. This does of course have tremendous implications for the rapidly developing field of personalised medicines.
by Rupert Brooke
18 And when they came down to him, Elisha prayed unto the LORD, and said, Smite this people, I pray thee, with blindness. And he smote them with blindness according to the word of Elisha.
The title of the novel revolves around the notion that all lovers fall into two categories – Givers and Takers:
The ending of the film (both the Harriet twist and Lisbeth being in love with Mikael) was also a lot weaker than the original film and I got up feeling dissatisfied. But then maybe I’m not the target audience, the people who wouldn’t want to watch a good film if it had subtitles.
Blacks are still being abused and exploited; it’s just that their masters are no longer white. Maids are still black, gardeners, construction workers, miners, heavy duty labourers are still black. What has changed? Where is the liberation? What has the current ANC government done since 1994? What are the excuses?
Upstairs, as was common in dime museums, Keith set up a small theatre for variety: 123 folding chairs and a modest stage. He introduced the acts himself, more out of necessity than any inclination or talent to perform. Keith was a plodding sort of character, colorless, and surprisingly bereft of imagination for a circus man. Like Ringo, without “a little help from his friends” one suspects he would have been a footnote in these annals, instead of the most important player. Yet from one sordid Boston museum, the Keith empire would come to embrace a continent, employ thousands of showpeople, and even form the groundwork for the entertainment institutions we enjoy today. The fact that your hometown probably had, (and maybe still has), a Keith Theatre in it, is probably more owed to a man named Edward F. Albee (the grandfather—by adoption—of the playwright, whom for reasons that may become obvious, never stresses the connection).
shrimp become pink, 6-8 minutes.
“I don’t even know what that is.”
“Beef tongue. Now I ask you, what kind of person buys that? Put it in a potion or something, I bet. Mind, I’m only tellin’ you this ‘cause you’re new to town, and you got them young kids to look after. See, I ain’t afraid to speak my mind.”
Today I am grateful for these two clowns. :)
A week after Nick Saban mentioned the possibility on an SEC teleconference, Curry said, “We have not heard from them.”
Zen Critter’s website can be found at:
Pulls them close to me.
I always knock before I walk into my sixteen-year-old daughter’s bedroom. Gender issues aside, I remember how my parents never allowed that courtesy, because, it was their roof and their rules, damn it. So, I got what I deserved when I entered a few days ago.
i will keep working
For instance, it’s raining and this is your debut novel. Three people show up. Treat them like royalty. Instead of standing at the front of the room, sit down with them and chat. At a reading not too long ago, a fan had a seizure and the author had to ask if there was a doctor in the
But frankly, that’s far too much work and I’m a slacker (apparently) so I’m not going to. It’s gone 2:30am and I still have many hours of insomnia ahead of me, so all I’ll say is that if you fancy having a crack at it then be my guest. Enjoy.
Pakatan has deflected repeated calls by civil society to set up a shadow Cabinet claiming that it would burden its resources.
~Emmy recently decided she wanted both her fingers and toes painted. So I obliged (I have no idea where she gets this stuff I don't paint my toenails or fingernails). She was very pleased and went along her away.
1 Corinthians 9:1 Am I not free? Am I not an apostle? Have I not seen Jesus our Lord? Are you not my work in the Lord?
I find Pinterest a very useful tool in my mission to procrastinate from housework as much as possible. It's also a wonderful place find recipes and craft ideas. Today, I thought I'd share some of my favorite finds:
Are you a Potter fan or Twilight? Perhaps both?
Honestly, I was totally skeptical that it would work. I thought the method was pretty corny, and couldn't imagine myself running back and forth 10 times every time she had an accident. But, I did it, and I do think it worked.
While pasta is cooking, prepare the tofu ricotta. In a large bowl, crumble the drained tofu with your fingers. Add the Vegenaise, garlic, lemon juice, salt, 1” slice of grated Teese, basil and oregano. Mix well with a fork until all ingredients are blended. Set ricotta aside.
Serve as a side for 4 people or as a light lunch for 2-3.
It just means I take more time playing around with an outfit...and who doesn't like playing dress-up!
Kate sighed in relief. He was playing with her. This was a threat, not a murder. She’d been right when she’d interviewed him back at the factory; this man wasn’t a killer. And now he was just playing copycat.
There has been so much doom and gloom in regard to this Mercury Rx and these eclipses. I’m going to try something different.
“I don’t hear any beeping Mom. Maybe you are finally going crazy. I know the time has been nearing. You seem to be losing it lately Mom.” I pressed three again. And again.
Look into my eyes…
In countries in which the media is controlled by the government, it is easy for people to disregard what they read or hear because it is all coming from the same source, even when there is room for different opinions. A system in which the mass media is believed to be independent is far more effective at suffusing a society with an ideology — such a system is not the result of some sort of conspiracy or a conscious plan, it is simply a natural outgrowth of corporate institutions growing so powerful at the expense of all other institutions.
“We, like you, are refugees from the world. … We, like you, could no longer handle the pace and the pressure. We, like you, have made the decision to escape the madness and to find here, on our asteroid, a far simpler lifestyle. A lifestyle you are more than welcome to join in.
By observing the daily routine in and around the bank, Kerbel reveals the most detailed security measures such as: the exact route and time of money transportation; the location of CCTV cameras in and around the bank along with precise floor plans that mark the building's blind spots. Kerbel's meticulous plans include every possible detail required to commit the perfect crime.
With the book of nature, man remains external to the metaphor, as the intended reader. Human beings are among the things brought under the clock metaphor, however, in the works of Voltaire and Vauvenargues. The French moralists typically indentified the passions with the internal working of the clock, and reason as the display (in a way that hoped to gain assent and accomplish their aims) of those hidden instincts and passions. (72-73)
The movie is, in fact, a very faithful adaptation of Jon Hassler’s book. But as wonderful and heartwarming as I found the movie, the book is that much richer, layered with romance, faith, and endearing characters that made me fall in love with them as much as they did for each other.
In my English world I have a small cottage in the countryside near a town thats name ends with shire. I get snowed in there in the winter. I have a garden in the summer. I don’t kill all the plants in this world.
I can promise you that
Pan Pacific Orchard
Rochdale girls who were living in what is imaginatively known as “care” were recruited into sexual factory farming by Muslim men described as “pure evil” by detectives. The 59-year-old ringleader was banned from court for calling the judge a “racist bastard”. His barrister explained that his client “had objected from the start to being tried by an all-white jury. He believes his convictions have nothing to do with justice but result from the faith and race of the defendants.” In other words, a racist who treats poor white girls as sub-human seriously believes it is he who is the victim of racism, when he is called to account for organising the gang-rape of under-age females. To be fair, it takes 40 years of well-intentioned multiculturalism to achieve that kind of moral mess.
Title: Why We Broke Up
Him: Give me the list
Four TV Shows You Love(d) to Watch
And there are scores of others using various different models, each extending a vital lifeline to local growers and helping satisfy the needs of food shoppers who care about the quality and values of their food
Me: are you done yet?
My lovely granddaughter was born on Jan. 26th
And now I know
From the Right, Rep. Paul Ryan offered a suitably draconion budget with cuts to the bone across the board, but especially on social services. From the lunatic fringe, Rep. Ron Paul suggested the federal government declare bankruptcy. The moderate republican obama administration, they of the “transformative change” — have been content with a few tweaks — a bailout here, a quantitative easing there, with a smokescreen of serious speeches pledging to seriously do something serious one of these days. From the left have come no comprehensive plans, only shrill warnings not to touch Medicare or Social Security.
But don't let that keep you from discovering our nature, as every encounter is worth it, and that goes for plants, fruits, herbs, birds, animals, reptiles, and of course all of the nature they live in overhere.
The tie-dye flats below are from Dune. They were a bargain in the sale for £26 but armed with a couple of gift cards, I only had to pay a measly £6 for them. They are made from buttery soft leather and the bows are always a winner with me.
Answer on Where can i check the license of a minicab company?
I love sweets.
Cruise originally starred as the character “Maverick” in the movie, written by Tony Scott.
the Race for the Cure...
As seen from the last half of the chapters, this is a Masechet that deals with some rather serious issues, namely those of capital punishment, but – maybe surprisingly at first thought – also on some much more issues, namely on the subjects of establishing, organizing and outlining rules for the courts. The reason for these being more important, is found in the fact that without courts, there would be no court rulings, and without rules for those rulings, there would be now red line to follow, when making rulings. So by this the justice of the court is (hopefully) established, and we can look closer on the rules that the courts have to rule after.
3:00pm: cocktail count 7
Shiv Malik highlights the latest silly welfare reform idea from the government. The idea is to cut housing benefit for workless people under twenty-five. Here is the Telegraph spin on it:
But every man is tempted, when he is drawn away of his own lust, and enticed. Then when lust hath conceived, it bringeth forth sin: and sin, when it is finished, bringeth forth death. – James 1:14-15 KJV
Thursday 9th -
Here's a sample -- from a different show, for sure, but it'll give you an idea of it:
You may recall that I was going to keep you in the loop about what I've been doing to the apartment...alas, like all my other blog content it has been largely tied up on the "important, but not as important as feeding and clothing my children" list. ;) Until today!
When we went to the all-volunteer military, after the Vietnam War, we changed to that model. And, what became important, when we used to give an operations order, the commander gave a mission statement and a set of tasks. And, we added to that what was called “Commander’s Intent”; the intention of the commander. That overrode the tasks and the mission, because you were given a set of missions and tasks that were based on what you knew at that moment. Like everybody knows, no plan survives the first shot that is fired.
american psycho
It is this image that I suddenly remember in the concert hall foyer, as my father finally lets the folds of cardinal red fall open, and I wonder if he is thinking of that day some thirty years ago, footnoted so fleetingly on film. As he fumbles with the sleeves, the zipper, the hook, his face remains unreadable, his eyes focused solely on the task at hand. Because he has been raised to be this way -- practical, unsentimental -- he will not let on, even if this garment reminds him of the chapel and the lawn and the few seconds' pause before the click of the camera's shutter.
Hearts On Noses has an article in a Polish publication this month so if anyone can translate the article for me by even reading it out loud to me drop me a line!!
An acquaintance on Facebook recently posted a link that states for the 2011-2012 school year, Walmart will feed every child that attends a Dallas Public School a free breakfast. The initiative is called "Breakfast in the Classroom". The Dallas Independent School District (DISD) is one of only 5 major school districts in the country chosen to share a 3 million dollar Walmart Foundation Grant that funds the program. The link above lists a myriad of reasons why a good breakfast is so important to a student's productivity in school, and I agree wholeheartedly with every one.
Countrywide Faulted
As Fraser points out, an explanation may be found from a 2005 issue of “Decision Makers’ Exchange” (DME), the monthly newsletter for DLA and Attendance Allowance decision makers: “Confirmation that Medical Services (ie. the DWP) have adopted the Biopsychosocial Model for assessing not just claims based on incapacity for work but also DLA and AA came in the July edition of Decision Makers’ Exchange…An item explained that Medical Services have recently introduced a change in the way that they assess a customer’s disabilities and the effect it has on their lives. The Biopsychosocial Model aims to address how a person’s disability has an effect on that individual’s life”. The newsletter features an article by Mansel Aylward, former Chief Scientist at the DWP, entitled “Professor Aylward endorses the Biopsychosocial Model of Disability….Conditions for which there is limited or no recognised pathological basis, such as chronic fatigue, fibromyalgia…feature regularly in disability assessments for state benefits….The Biopsychosocial Model is the answer to the disability analyst’s plight”.
The Floor is Lava (15) – Traveled a half mile using only Wall Run, Glide, Jump and Air Dash
three were posted when manyof you weren’t subscribing to my blog. I
A student was on the level of servant to the teacher, there was almost nothing that a teacher could not ask his disciple to do for him. Jesus rejects that sort of relationship, serving his disciples humbly (washing their feet) and then laying down his life for his friends.
Left-over bolognaise with rice (the last of it thank goodness)
plaid scarf-from Tokyo
The boys are doing fine for the most part too. They finished up their first semester in school. Tony did very well and Tyler has a fresh start with new classes. Last week, Tony was sick with a bad cold and stayed home for three days and then Tyler got mono. He went back to school today but I hope he takes it easy and rests. Resting is a foreign concept for that boy.
Double napkins in a nito ring. Doesn't the sweet chartreuse button flower make a dashing appearance?
FDR (getting excited): We’ll have a Hundred Days program. We’ll get as much through Congress as we possibly can – we’ll spend as much as we can print. It’ll be awe-inspiring!
2 c. light brown sugar
This jalapeno popper dip was making the rounds on several food blogs during football season last year, but I'm sort of a wimp when it comes to spicy foods, so I was hesitant to try it. With every rave review I read, though, I became more and more intrigued. I wound up deciding to bring it to Shane's company holiday party last week, figuring there would be plenty of people to help polish it off, even if it was too spicy for me.
The graduation soiree needs to be planned and executed.
Gosh, what a surprise…!!!
~ The Coming of Conan (1953)
Here is one of the pictures.
On January 3, I called our pediatrician's office to ask about Annie's sudden weight loss and extreme thirst, symptoms we'd noticed for the previous couple weeks. With the New Year's holiday long weekend, it was my first chance to call after realizing just how severe her symptoms were. I was told to take her right in for a blood test, and that's when we got her Juvenile Diabetes diagnosis. I first wrote about that here. Since Annie's diagnosis, our time has been filled with doctor's appointments and educating ourselves about this disease. But in the four months since she was diagnosed, Annie did finally get to make her first Beads of Courage bag. Her grandma came over and the two of them spent an afternoon figuring out the pattern and making one finished bag. Annie was so excited to finally make it! She plans on making more.
To make matters worse, the Department of Labor (DOL) announced that Solyndra’s former employees qualify for federal aid packages worth $13,000 each under DOL’s Trade Adjustment Assistance (TAA) program, which compensates and retrains American workers who can prove that their jobs were lost as a result of foreign competition. The TAA benefits far exceed normal unemployment benefits. The DOL granted TAA to Solyndra’s employees by accepting the company’s claim that it went belly up as a result of unfair competition by Chinese solar panel manufacturers, rather than from mismanagement by company executives.
And if you are reading this blog because you also live with chronic pain and/or health issues then I'm sure that you can understand when I tell you that I have not been feeling that well.
TOSS lettuce with carrots, avocados and cucumbers in large bowl. Add remaining dressing; mix lightly. Place on 4 plates.
"A country is at its best when the bonds between people are strong and when the sense of national purpose is clear".
...am a bookworm. Books, magazines...whatever can be read.
The APF conducted visits to Pakistan in 2005 and 2008 to meet with key stakeholders and has provided technical advice during the drafting of legislation to promote compliance with the Paris Principles.
Flirt actually runs into a slate environmental problems. Some arts of seduction may not be terribly appropriate for all situations . For example, if you’re on a desert island and one of six dozen people who have survived a plane crash, what you should do is sharpen a stick or a rock so that your target and then assert dominance over them and the group.
Finally, the correct answer given by the customer service blob was B. And, his parting shot was: “You can always call Customer Service.”
Mmmmmm.... it's finally starting to feel like Fall around here!
I'm not feeling so put upon this month. But there's always something to whine about.
Audio recording formats: WAV (normal), AMR (MMS), AAC/MP4 (high quality)
If you think that the borrower needs to give you some thing valuable against your money you are going to lend, just go ahead and ask the person! You have all the rights to protect your money your self and your belongings even if you need to get other party or parties information. It will be all up to you all!
I finally got around to watching Invictus tonight. If you haven't seen it, go rent it immediately. I'm a sucker for any movie where sports serve as a metaphor for life and there are myriad reasons why this movie is amazing that I won't go into here, Matt Damon's thighs are the least of it.
A friend of mine recently brought an excellent Windows program to my attention… It’s called “IGC Flight Replay“, it’s free and it can be downloaded from here.
I post about the funny and silly stuff that people think is an emergency when it isn't. For example, when they call 911 because they picked up a dead dog and don't know what to do. The dog is dead and not a person and no 911 center can help with that. Most other people would agree they would leave the dead dog on the road.
Whiz
Because spyware exists as independent executable programs, they have the capability to monitor your keystrokes, scan files on the hard drive, snoop other applications, such as chat programs or word processors, install other spyware programs, readcookies, change the default home page on the Web browser, while consistently relaying this information back to the spyware author who will either use it for advertising and marketing purposes or sell the information to another party.
2 bags sour cola bottles candy
It's gluten-free and the perfect marinade for chicken or sauce to spice up your stir fry. I simply placed a few chicken breasts in a casserole dish and poured a little sauce on top. I then covered the dish with foil and baked at 350 for 45 minutes. Mix up a quick batch of quinoa and steamed veggies, and you have a nutritious and protein packed dinner in no time!
NATURAL ENEMIES starts from here, and depicts Paul on his last day on earth. In its methodical depiction of its protagonist's daily routine, the film is almost reminiscent of John G. Avildsen's SAVE THE TIGER (1973), but unlike Jack Lemmon's garment factory owner in that film, Paul Steward is already dead to himself when we meet him.
Asking the question ‘How did I create 38 million climate refugees?’, the t-shirts support EJF’s ‘No Place Like Home’ campaign for climate refugees which raises awareness of the plight of people who have been forced from their homes and land due to natural disasters like flooding and storms. Unlike the 10 million refugees recognized by the UN Refugee Agency, these people currently have no legal status or protection. EJF is calling for urgent international action to provide them with legal recognition, assistance and protection.
And as for Mort, he has had a pretty great weekend too. Yesterday, on our journey back from the land of no mobile signal, I finally heard my phone beep-beep. And this is what I saw.
* Puncture resistant tyres
Mr G and I just saw the most amazing sight – a beautiful fuzzy blob with a steady, strong heartbeat of 150. Measuring at 7w2d, which is right on track.
So when my two-year old began yelling and spitting at me, I looked at her and let out a hysterical, I’m-losing-my-sanity kind of laugh. If you have kids, you know exactly what I’m referring to. And, you know, I felt a little better after that.
No more bike riding. That was the biggest change. Really I can bike ride but just pleasure, only me on the bike and only a mile or two at a time. My knee is terrible, not going to improve and it’s life. I told him I didn’t like the bike because of the pain but figured I’d get stronger and could learn to like it. Nope, that part isn’t going to happen he says. Okay so the next thing we talked about….
2 cups baby spinach
The issue was that in response, Beckett decided to unveil the inner workings of his mind.
So let’s be positive. Darren getting kicked and beaten by Tray was quite nicely choreographed. The scene between Lucy as prostitute and her client was interesting because playwright Carol Vine clearly didn’t really believe that people could do such things. Kirstie Brough as Lucy put in a brave and determined performance. I think I learned some new words: flid, t-bar, jesy, but maybe not with those meanings.
Ok we've changed the direction of the asteroid now remind me again how we are supposed to catch it
It is the perfect linking between the ideology of the globalists with a strong propensity for Keynesian economics, crony capitalism as facilitated in the U.S. by the Federal Reserve, the U.S. Treasury, numerous lawmakers, with the tactics of Saul Alinsky, and the ultimate leadership from the executive branch to Progressive foot soldiers and actual domestic terrorists including, but not limited to William Ayers, Bernadine Dohrn and others.
Eventually I went to see my doctor who suggested I see Paul’s paediatrician and ask for sleeping medicine for him, which I did. It worked well for the first couple of weeks; Paul slept for about five hours solid every night, which meant I could sleep for five hours, too. I still had the dreams, but I was able to get back to sleep after checking on Paul and seeing him fast asleep.
Hey, if it kept him from licking the shopping cart, who was I to complain?
Excuse/Issue Resolution Four:
Bake cookies, rotating baking sheet halfway through, until golden around the edges, 10 to 12 minutes. Transfer to a wire rack to cool. Store in airtight containers at room temperature up to four days.
This is a time to start many projects. Time to create, plant, sew, love!
1/2 pound red pearl onions, skinned by blanching and peeling
As Maricopa County Attorney Bill Montgomery strode up to the dais, he said with a smile, “Don’t start my time!” And then he reached beneath the podium to retrieve a bouquet of roses.
Now it was time to hand off to Van 1 again and go find our midway hotel. Because of the twisty-turny nature of the route we were able to get a midway hotel which we were able to go back to during our off time. It was great! During our first break, we grabbed a shower, some food & a nap. Our nap was cut short when we got a call that the other van was way ahead of schedule and we had to hit the road in a hurry. So 30 minutes for me. As the first runner in our van I hit panic stations trying to make sure I had all my requisite nighttime gear. In the process of dressing I made a bad decision. I decided to change my shoes to my ascics cumulus that I run in occasionally thinking that the wider toe box would be nice. OMG, my right heel was killing me within 2 miles. It was a hard run for me. I have never run in the dark...and it was a little spooky. I had to put my headphones away because every time someone passed me I'd freak out. It wasn't much more comforting to hear the heavy breathing bearing down on you though. Plus the sidewalks were uneven so I had to be really careful with my footing. So I was slow. Like 11:24 pace slow. I passed a beach along the way and then wound through some residential neighbourhoods. My awesome van stopped at a turn they thought might be hard for me to find and made sure I was ok. It was so good to see them and they pumped me up for the rest of the run! It is weird running with a headlamp...like running in a tunnel! I had a lot of miles to cover in this second leg, but 2 of my van-mates had to do trails....now that was spooky for them! Lots of people didn't like the trails and were surprised they were there. We were surprised too, but I guess if you actually READ the Ragmag, you'd have seen they were clearly marked. None of us got lost, for which I was very thankful! But I will say that the road markers could have been closer together, especially on the trail sections. It was all very Blair Witch Project-like.
The trials were unusual for England at that time in two respects: the official publication of the proceedings by the clerk to the court, Thomas Potts, in his The Wonderfull Discoverie of Witches in the Countie of Lancaster, and in the number of witches hanged together: ten at Lancaster and one at York. It has been estimated that all of the English witch trials between the early 15th and early 18th centuries resulted in fewer than
In a thrilling new novel about a reluctant mobster, Anya tries to shatter the ties that bind — with deadly consequences.
- Stick a piece of plain or patterned paper or a picture over the whole thing.
When he moved in on Monday he turned round to me and said “Danielle thank you for everything. Before Create I never thought this would happen for me. Everything you have done has been amazing”.
One of the projects I've taken on is photographing each of the staff members, and creating a name plate for them that is hung by their classroom door. This was to serve two purposes: 1) to identify teachers to students, parents and visitors, and 2) to update the outdated name plates. Each photo was printed out in 5x7, and matted using a sheet of scrapbook paper--use your stash!-- (cut 10x10) and framed in an 8x10 acrylic box frame (found at any craft store, Walmart or Target.) The paper wraps around the sides of the frame, and I enjoy how it looks. I did take the liberty to add the name of each teacher to the photo before printing, but you could easily add it with stickers as well. So far, I've only completed about 25% of the staff. I should be finished by the end of this month. Cost: $5 per project.
Attach 3 photos of your fave papercrafting projects
Yesterday, the nice nurse at the GP surgery took seven vials of my blood. I hope she isn't thinking of wearing them around her neck, Angelina-style. It's Easter Bank Holiday weekend tomorrow and the blood probably won't get tested until next week.
"Lips Like Sugar" is a single by Echo & the Bunnymen which was released in August 1987. It was the second single from their 1987 eponymous album. It reached number 36 on the UK Singles Chart and number 24 on the Irish Singles Chart. The single was released as a 7-inch single and a 12-inch single by WEA Records and by Sire Records as a 12-inch single in the U.S.
Apologies for the slight tingle...
I guess I'll just keep quitting til it sticks,
ROM 1:16 For I am not ashamed of the gospel of Christ: for it is the power of God unto salvation to every one that believeth; to the Jew first, and also to the Greek.
Among the top ten tourist markets for 2011 were Singapore (13,372,647), Indonesia (2,134,381), China (1,250,536), Australia (558,411), United Kingdom (403,940), and Japan (386,974).
Here's where you lose me. He's meticulous so his wife divorces him and his daughter doesn't much like him so he draws strength from a 16 year old online prostitute? That doesn't feel very real to me, but more than that it makes the protagonist seem weak and frankly, rather icky.
CeeCee has grown up as the sole caretaker for her irretrievably mentally ill mother. Her father, unable to face up to the realities of his marriage, has retreated into his work and is barely ever home, leaving CeeCee to bear the brunt of her mother’s unstable moods and wild antics. Old before her time and robbed of her childhood and all semblance of normality, CeeCee turns to her beloved books and her elderly neighbor, Mrs Odell, for solace and a place of respite. But when she is twelve years old, her already chaotic world is thrown into further disarray when her mother makes a dramatic exit from her life at the beginning of
I can see this one ending up on Dragon's Den. But in the archival context we should always ask ourselves why we are wearing them, and own up if we they make us dangerously clumsy.
Food cravings: Baked potatoes have been on the top of my list this week. I must be in my carb phase right now.
Decision #5: Writing a blog post that includes zero pictures of cute children. Sorry, far-flung relatives! I will get to that soonish!
Obama knows that if he acts out the evil that is in his soul, the American people would overwhelmingly reject him in November. He has to wait until the American people can’t touch him to unleash his master plan to “fundamentally transform America.”
Wow, this goat has already added me.
- 2 c. of flour
We’d certainly recommend that other groups like ours get involved in any future projects and activities like this.
One thing I've learned is that it doesn't get any easier - you just set the bar higher as you go. And there are always going to be people who are more successful than you, so why worry about it? I've also discovered that authors, and children's authors in particular, are some of the maddest, funniest and kindest people in the world.
It will make a nice gift for my Brother and his Wife's new baby,
'Feeling a bit useless' didn't explain the worst crime spree committed by a human since the Realmcrash, but how to draw more out of him? Van Raighan had shrunk inside himself, slouching further, and it was hard to remember how much he'd been feared. How much Federas feared him, probably even now. After the deaths at Af, every Northern town had reason to fear the loss of their Stable Rods.
to it – to get it cut by a homey. trimmed, really. i wanted to keep the length but just give it a bit of shape. and that's exactly what went down.
Though this recipe is fairly filling for one person you can easily double or triple the recipe. If you're using pancake mix pay attention to the quantities given on the box and simply grate enough zucchini and onion that it seems like you have at least half of each. I like the sweetness that a generic pancake mix gives these pancakes but for a healthier option try making the mix from scratch.
A feature of UK TV that has long amused me are the made up brands that often appear in UK dramas. From the Stellaberg lager that Frank Gallagher drinks in the TV show Shameless to the well known Newton and Ridley fictional northern regional brewery whose ales are sold in the Rover’s Return pub in Coronation Street. Drinking is a normal form of behaviour in TV drama. In fact the behaviour is more than a little contrived. No one really goes to the pub with the regularity of TV characters, but the fictional pub provides a social setting for characters to interact, a requirement of drama. Arguably one of the more ridiculous elements isn’t the frequency of pub going but the number of characters in the soap EastEnders that use the local laundrette with a regularity that suggests they either do not possess washing machines or they have all bought ones that break down on a weekly basis.
Soft as spring wind that's come from birchen bowers.
Sit. Sat. Sitting.
Mix.
The repair shop found a nail on our tire and fixed it. Our car has an air pressure lamp which will come on if the tire has low pressure. Do most cars have this? Thanks to this function, I was able to avoid a flat tire. I love Toyota.
Remember, if you want your Happy Lately List featured on this here blog, just shoot me an email, and we'll make it happen. Have a wonderful Thanksgiving, and whatever table you're gathered around this year, may it be full of conversation, laughter, and of love.
Before I found the joy of writing, I thought I wanted to become an actress. It sounded like a great idea at the time: dressing up in cool costumes, playing someone else, bringing a story to life. So my mum sent me to Speech and Drama classes.
Mr Silva was furious that the media storm over the incident has focused on the city’s sex industry – where prostitution is legal.
So, if you cyber shop, you may not face the risk of being trampled to death by an unruly crowd, or being shot to death by an angry shopper – both tragedies actually did happen on Black Friday, November 28, 2008. But, you will face substantial cyber security risks.
Finally, as always, the strongest part of the episode was undoubtedly the music. Not only did this episode dispense with the dream sequence numbers--all of these numbers were legitimately being performed--but they also, of course, featured the megatalented Emmy-winning actress, Kristin Chenoweth, for whom, incidentally, my sister claims she would go gay.
I guess I prepared well for the climb to Hurricane Point. Yep, it sucked. But, I short-strided it and maintained a steady pace of about 9:15-minute miles, which is great considering my marathon pace was about 9:04.
If those sailors had known Paul’s office of apostleship, they would have listened to him. Is it not the same with man today? If one recognizes Paul’s unique apostleship he will heed that which he has written.
85mph .....................This World Is Not My Home
Thanks for coming over to my kitchen!
10. If you ask the blogging community a straight question, they will respond with a straight answer. So if you really DON'T want to know why a particular post was a dud, do not write a post like this one.
I want my mind to be alert, I want to be quick witted with students, I want to engage them in the small moments. I want to be rested so I can enjoy my weekends with Matt, drive safe on my weekend commute, and remember the small details about my loved ones. I want to run like the best luxury car out there. Yet I treat my body like an old beat-up hooptie. I neglect it, pump bad gas into it, and leave the check engine light unattended to for way too long. I keep saying I'll get to it, but I don't. I leave it alone, treat it like crap, and hope my mind will miraculously pick up my body's slack.
LleMoyne turned and gave me a look. “He’s going to be a tough nut to crack.”
Step 1: Assemble your tools. Here is what you’ll need.
I used my mother's Federalist Ironstone and added salad plates from Burlington Coat Factory and appetizer plates from Ross. The rattan chargers are from Goodwill and I've used them several times before.
an apostle of godly
The picture here shows what freedom means, taken somewhere I do not even remember, but who cares, as the Croatian Zagora (the hinterland) has trillions of spots like this one.
½ cup Dunkin' Donuts original blend coffee, brewed
Addtionally, we will do $20,000.00 dollars of inside repairs and renovations.
Udhin hittu - Urad dal spice powder
June 2008 when I started, February 2010 when the contract was signed.
SDR is anxious to work on all of our pictures from Jackson so I have to be real quick-like with this post!
So, adding to its greatness, the bridge’s two gothic towers were taller than most any building in New York at the time (only the spire of Trinity Church in Lower Manhattan was higher.). They were some of the largest manmade structures on the continent.
Having a minimum order of a box of 20, I was really hoping this would be good, and with a hop list including Hercules, Chinook, Citra, Cascade and Nelson Sauvin, well, how couldn't it be? An unfiltered, pale amber brew. The aroma in one word: fruity. In a few more: well, gooseberries, mandarin, herbal and a little catty. It doesn't really hit hard on first sip, being somewhat lemonade-y, and a tad thin, but it has hop-driven flavours enough, with hay, soft thyme, white grapes and a lingering, lemony finish. At 40 IBUs, it's tastes surprisingly mild, with most of the hops apparantly delivering that melange of fruity flavours. I can't help thinking it would benefit from a little more malty backbone, and was a little underwhelmed on my first bottle. Where it really comes into its own is direct from the bottle after a days work. The lightness of body combined with the refreshing, fruity hop profiles makes it a real thirst quencher, and I'd happily have more. I'm looking forward to seeing if the lads further develop this.
discarded
i did my first basket on saturday and wish i would
In an attempt to find a blog topic today, I started looking over my blog stats. Come to think of it, the only time I check my stats is when I need a topic. Hm. This time, the information about where my visitors are from was interesting to me.
Get across a busy street.
A straightforward design infringement, as with the copyright? Apparently not.
Jae keeps wicking the blood off his forehead and with the cop watching the barbarian hands us some sweaty bills. Guess we’re lucky to score any.
So lemme start with James Soriano, someone who praised the English language for being the language of the learned. It is actually a misunderstanding that he was only sarcastic against the educational system of the Philippines (well, side note: K-12 won’t include Philippine History in college, which sucks dick since according to a historian, the government is very selfish and wanted the Filipinos to only concentrate in three subjects. One word: BOO). Take note: Sarcastic. That is because everything in the government is written in English, and unfortunately, my parents were also miseducated with the fact that English should be more given attention to than Filipino. Now let me explain the historical details (Warning: Read @ yer own risk)…
But, something stopped me.
(Photo credits: friends.net)
Could it ever work again?
Exactly how embarassed do you think my children are that I am running around their neighbourhood in trainers where ANYONE could see me? (Their words, not mine)
Welcome to another fun and inspiring Blog Hop with the ScrapbookPal.com Design Team! Our theme this time around is Flower Power, and we've teamed up to bring you a whole bouquet of beautiful ideas. If this is your first stop, make sure you head back to the ScrapbookPal blog so you can visit all the designers and find out how to win a Cricut cartridge of your choice! ScrapbookPal.com has a fantastic selection of tools for paper-crafters, and they are adding new things all the time. They have great customer service, and shipping is always free on orders over $25 -- raise your hand if you HATE paying for shipping like I do! Yay for free shipping!
Now I lay here, exhausted from my meds, but wondering if I’m doing the right thing. Maybe the “etah distance” would be better received? Maybe it’s too much? Maybe the gears need to be put in reverse to make the ride more comfortable for my passenger? I could eventually let them out of my taxi, because this is like a NYC cab ride, but I’m down the turnpike and traveling into suburbia now, never to return. Do u have enough fare left?
Butter- 1/2 cup,at room temperature
I have seen change in all of the years gone by… and I say change is good.
. Business Card (2x front, 1x back)
I subscribe to them all. This month is pretty good, with humble little Southern Living taking the lead. Next is Traditional Home! Really! House Beautiful just gets by this month, mainly because I love the 101 Tips From The Experts. Architectural Digest is getting better since that breath of fresh called Margaret Russel took over. Elle Decor is at the bottom again. Hope they get their groove back. And that $11. Domino thing is a sad waste. Conde Nast might want to put Lonny or Rue into hard copy print instead.
I love that he tries to help around the house. It's cute when I have to go in and rearrange my cloths because he hung them up wrong. It shows me he tried.
April 29, 2012
While at the cabin we had been seeing signs for a big Christmas bazaar happening at a local high school the Saturday after Thanksgiving. We had been looking forward to it but, it closed so early that we didn’t get to go in and look around. However, we had seen signs for an antique and homemade items shop. After driving for a few miles out in the middle of nowhere, we found the shop.
twee is a brand new blog with tons of potential. corissa and her husband kris are the voice behind the posts and you really just need to go read them to understand how unique and clever these two are. corissa is also a talented photographer that i would LOVE to use sometime (see her photography sight here.) after looking through her blog, i think you'll agree... this girl just has an eye for things. and honestly, she is the biggest sweetheart. in asking each sponsor for a bio, corissa replied with, 'i really don't know what to say except that i believe whole heartedly in playfulness, love, marriage, and authenticity. those are the words that best describe me and my work and i hope that it shows.' well my dear, i definitely think it shows. all that and more! oh, and did i mention she will be giving away a free photography session tonight?
“The only moment where a Judge can express his opinion is during the deliberations or in the courtroom, and, pursuant to the Rules, when there are no serious deliberations, the only place left for me is the courtroom. I won’t get — because I think we have been sitting for too long but for me I have my dissenting opinion and I disagree with the findings and conclusions of the other Judges, because for me under any mode of liability, under any accepted standard of proof, the guilt of the accused from the evidence provided in this trial is not proved beyond reasonable doubt by the Prosecution. And my only worry is that the whole system is not consistent with all the principles we know and love, and the system is not consistent with all the values of international criminal justice, and I’m afraid the whole system is under grave danger of just losing all
Thank you all for following!! We appreciate you and hope you enjoy the FREEBIES! You must follow both of TpT stores to receive them. If you don't have an account with TpT, it is super easy to sign up and it doesn't cost a thing!! :-)
Not a week did we miss-
04. A New Machine (part 1)
Thursday we spent some time in Phoenix shopping, eating, and yes soaking up the warm weather. It was after all 25 degrees warmer than Portland that day. It felt so good to be with Chrissy again. To have time to deepen our friendship and laugh together.
Here’s something we might do every so often, particularly when the Almighty Internet seems to be burning with curiosity. This episode we took your questions. Any questions. All of them.
Woke up this morning, turned on the TV
In my last post I mentioned the embroidered picture I had entitled 'A list of reasons to run for the hills' and the lovely Mel said she was curious as to what was on the list so there you have it.
So here's the free shit I snagged:
Birth is as safe as life gets Dr Pesce. The therapeutic use of self as a health care practitioner is what makes both life and birth safer. As Barbara Katz Rothman says "birth is about making strong and capable mothers". Time to stop pulling the rug from under women's sense of self with all this 'turf war' rhetoric! Since pregnancy and birth are truly natural states, and are not, per se, reliant on outside management, the woman has a basic natural right to maintain personal control over primary level decisions, including if and when she goes to hospital. The midwife is the professional care provider with the skill and the ability to attend births at home. If a position statement which is endorsed by the regulatory authority effectively restricts the midwifery profession to attending only home births that meet criteria for being at ‘low risk’ from a clinical/obstetric perspective, a significant number of women will be either excluded from making an informed decision about home birth, or they may engage the services of unregulated attendants and continue to plan home birth. Neither of these options is in the interests of the mother’s and her baby’s wellbeing.
They are too lazy to deal with the messiness of finding the right people on the ground all over the world. It's much easier to just hire a "global" agency and let them worry about it. So they suspend disbelief and buy into the fiction (which creates gales of laughter in anyone who has ever worked at a global agency) about the "integrated worldwide capabilities" of these agencies.
Since coming home it has been a long waiting game for harvest to start. We had late rains this year and it just wasn't as hot as it usually gets. That means we haven't had enough heat index days to ripen the grapes. Sooo.... here we sit... waiting... Last year we started receiving grapes on August 18th and we didn't stop or get a day off until Thanksgiving. Pretty typical year. This year it is September 21st and I haven't worked a weekend yet! But we are all taking our supplements and trying to catch up on sleep because I think starting as early as tomorrow we are going to get SLAMMED. Pretty soon I won't know what my name is or what language I speak. Wish us luck. We are getting ready for a grape tsunami.
Kristie
Io ho una salsa di pomodoro che e' la classica base e chiamo Napoli. E' realmente semplice ed e' proprio questa semplicita' che mi ricorda la mia famiglia e le mie radici. In una pentola rosolate la cipolla e aggiungete il pomodoro passato. Il pelato si puo' semplicemete schiacciare con le mani o usando il passatutto, come preferite, io lo faccio in tutte e due modi, a volte con le mani e' piu' veloce. Aggiungete il sale e cuocete per 15 minuti a fuoco medio. Quando e' quasi cotta aggiungete il basilico, io amo metterci molto basilico. Se ci volete solo il gusto non lo tritate ma mettetelo intero, cosi' sara' piu' facile per voi toglierlo dal sugo. Lo potete utilizzare in svariati modi. Ne potete preparare molto e poi congerlarlo, io ho sempre un piccolo contenitore di sugo nel frigo, lo potete conservare fino ad una settimana.
And shopped black Friday (okay, it was Saturday) at G Street in Rockville
One might also notice that in this study, the association of intelligence with being ill was larger in the 1970 cohort versus the 1946 cohort - 0.80 vs. 0.70. Whether that is significant or not I don't know, but if it is it could be due to a lesser stigma attached to disability leave in more recent years, or to a more relaxed policy of granting such leave.
I totally love cookies that are chock full of yummy things (chocolate chips, nuts, toffee chips, you name it) or stuffed with something yummy (hello Oreo stuffed chocolate chip cookie!!)......but sometimes, simpler is better.
It’s not made holy.
Swallowed by its lung.
MandaPanda posted a fantastic post this morning about Band Timelines and I so appreciated it! Everything she says is dead on. I lost about 80 lbs in my first year and then found out I was pregnant and am now, 9 months after giving birth, back to that 80 lbs. I still have about 70 lbs to go so I'm barely even 1/2 way there. Like Manda says, it does get harder after that first year and you do have to work harder. I am living that truth right now. I also think that unless you exercise, what is the point of getting the band? You HAVE to incorporate exercise. It not only helps with the weight/fat loss, but it helps with the loose skin and honestly, it's all part of the motivation for me. I've been really frustrated with a lot of people on blogs wondering why they aren't losing the weight or making excuses non-stop when they post the things they eat, the fact that they aren't exercising and have lost motivation... uh, DUH, there is your answer right there. As many have said, the Band is just a tool. YOU have to do the majority of the work. There are so many other things I want to say right now about the many people seemingly opting/hoping for alternative surgeries (those that actually have problems with the band which require them to have revision surgeries are not included in this BTW.. I fully get there are many medical reasons to have to find alternative options due to erosion, slippage, etc) but I'll keep them to myself. There are so many successful Bandsters among us that have lost a lot of weight and have kept it off. We are very lucky that we can draw motivation from their successes every day! So, please don't give up!
Last Updated: April 26, 2012
“This lady that committed this crime, the judgment on her is to be killed at any opportunity; and the media house is also supposed to be driven out of existence whenever there is a chance to do so.“We are just getting the opportunity to attack the media house, and we are hoping to continue these attacks until we drive them out of existence.
Wolf Blass are one of the really famous Aussie producers and sort of set the trends for a lot of the newer guys. They are not old, having been founded by Wolfgang Blass in 1973 and many others have roots in the nineteenth century, but they came along exactly when Australian wine was beginning to change and become mainstream. They have become part of the Australian wine zeitgeist and many consumers know their reliable and approachable Yellow Label wines even if they do not know the higher level ranges, indeed Wolf Blass have come to be seen as a brand rather than a top-producer. This tasting though was all about the top end wines of the Wolf Blass stable and it was a really fascinating insight into the remarkable quality they can produce.
Your Team Member: “When you say you are looking for a large sport utility vehicle, can you tell me more?”
Some start on top and fall. Like Humpty Dumpty.
at 16 months old.
Obviously I've still got lots of landscaping and clean-up to do (after that wall gets painted!), but this was another major step in converting what used to be the back of the house into a proper front entry. Plans for next year include moving the front door - we positioned the new stairs right in front of where I want it to go!
Well, those of us who didn't get held over to work a double got to go home, anyway. We are critically short of staff and some of the directives coming down are making that even worse.
kaye and i created an invitation design using one we found on the internet. it features a blonde boy in a hard hat.
Good gaming, and... always remember to have fun!
The noise of the railway and the necessary bustle of traffic would render the station place itself unsuitable to be the main square or assembly-ground of the town ; and quieter surroundings would also be better for the public buildings and Government offices.
2. Grilling shrimp kabobs
Would you draw me from my home
The Custom pack adds on a design consultation and cover, a step up in the amount of graphics, 50 postcards, the starter personalised website with domain and er….well your starting to see where I’m going with this. The extra bucks are now $700 and I’m starting to wonder why Xlibris did not just stick with the initial three publishing packs they had on offer last year! At least the add-ons were more bulked together in the available packs.
Grace and Jack were wonderful and as we left we made sure we were going to keep in touch - hmmmm could there be some awesome collaborations between Grace and Sue Rock?
The only amazing thing about my career in Hollywood is that I ever had one at all.
This scene that takes place in Jerusalem at Passover exemplifies the faith engendered by signs.
He sat there for a while, maybe hours, and maybe days. The sheep eventually got used to him. In their eyes he looked like a hill, covered with juicy grass. Beauty watched them with astonishment. What were those creatures? He had never seen them. Or did he? When one of the white woolly what-are-theys walked onto his hand, Beauty raised it slowly.
My entries were scanned from the magazine so aren't quite as bright as in real life. Though they published all three, they featured and gave instructions for how to make the one with the heart.
However, I think there is one significant disagreement, less so with Roberts than Romm I think, who summarized Roberts’ article as:
“Wim the Tim CSC.”
Wyatt — you do not have ACC or English today. You will have English on Tuesday, Wednesday and Friday this week. You will have ACC on Wednesday this week.
She writes, ‘ I pity celebrities. No, I do. Celebrities were once perfectly pleasant human beings, but now, their wrath is awful. More than any of us, they wanted fame and recognition. They worked, the pushed . . . The morning after each of them became famous, they wanted to take an overdose because that giant that giant thing they were striving for, that fame thing that was going to make everything okay, that was gong to make their lives bearable, that was going to provide them with personal fulfillment and happiness, had happened. And nothing changed. They were still them. The disillusionment turned them howling and insufferable.’
Now a few tips on the meal itself.
But Judge Robert Gregory of the Fourth Circuit didn't buy it. He writes: "an officer and the Government must do more than simply label a behavior as "suspicious" to make it so...the Government cannot rely upon post hoc rationalizations to validate those seizures that happen to turn up contraband."
I mean, I'm supposed to do this, right? I'm supposed to make her wear a coat when it's cold, correct? Don't the other mothers all judge when a kid comes to school underdressed for the weather?
Causes?
The bartender and Old Man laughed. The other customers simply stared at me.
Don’t put all your eggs in one basket.
14. My cycle is only 24 days long, which is apparently normal in some people, but sucks.
Know where to draw the line.
In other words, this verse is about loving other people. It’s not about you. It’s about the whole flock, the whole of your community or even humanity. It’s a verse about loving your neighbor.
Lynette's (Urban Scrapbook) choice for our monthly tag swap. I think I have mentioned it before, there are five of us participating in a monthly tag swap, each taking turns to choose the challenge. This month, Lynette's challenge was for us to use only a 12 x 12 piece of white cardstock when making each tag. We were allowed to ink, mist, etc. Well, ever since making my tags, I'm addicted to using white cardstock, which I don't normally use a lot of. I like color, probably because we are surrounded by that ugly white stuff called snow for way too many months! Anyways, I was inspired by work done by one of my favorite papercutting artists, the amazing Elsa Mora. Sometimes, she includes a small piece of colored paper in her white creations, which I love. I'm always amazed at how intricate her pieces are, especially when you realize they are all cut out with a knife or scissors and how small they are. I know what you are thinking but no, I didn't even try and attempt to cut out everything by hand, I have my trusty Slice machine! Even using my machine, I messed up many times! So here's my tag, but the picture isn't that great. I discovered it's not that easy to take a photo of something that is all white!
10- NCIS:LA
Santa was standing in his sleigh waving to them and on their front porch was a tall, beautiful, decorated Christmas tree with flashing lights and a beautiful star shining on the top of the tree.
Thanks to the former president (your favorite - $%^#@!!!), the country has been in the worst recession since the great depression in which you spent your childhood and modeled your life of living within your means.
As I pottered along I noticed a bustling market. It appeared busy. The smells of cooking food were enticing to my palette. I didn’t realise I was hungry until I smelt the aroma of cooking meat. Then I realised I was starving. I realised that if I didn’t consume some dead animal inside a bread roll with a dollop of mustard on it I would most likely pass out from hunger. A swift right turn and I was heading in the direction of cooking meat.
2 AUT 5 3 0 1 1 7
Another volleyball match went down on Saturday, but the Japanese team was once struggling against the international competition and lost 0:3, this time to the team from Italy.
I'm not sure if the single image above qualifies for Phoctober over at Moon Topples or not - the general instructions are, well, general... but take a look and see what's happening anyway.
The phrase, “quarter-life crisis”, always sends me back in time, to the tiny little bedroom of my tiny little Upper East Side apartment. It was about five years ago, and I was sitting on my queen-sized bed, which took up the entire width and most of the length of the room, talking on the phone with one of my best friends from high school. We were both in our third year out of college. She was a psychology major, working in insurance sales. I was in law school. We were both single. I remember spending almost four hours on the phone with her that night, rolling around in my bed and giggling often as we analyzed and obsessed about our respective futures. During that call, we were each online researching divorce rates (tailored to our demographic), psychologically profiling ourselves and of course, consulting our Inner Realm horoscopes. We discussed the various “signs” and “existential coincidences” that we had each encountered, begging the other for some new perspective on What It All Means. We were grasping at straws, desperately seeking the answers to the rest of our lives. Together, we decided that we were in quarter-life crisis.
Samsung has gone all out to the kill the other competitors in the Tab market. No one but this leviathan stands tall while other companies run for cover.
-PJ's. We go through some serious pajamas around here. I feel like everytime I turn around he's outgrown a pair. I LOVE the ones from Children's Place for multiple reasons, but mainly because they zip and are lean. They run small so he's already in size 6-9months. For a Christmas gift I'd say size 6-9 or 12months, fleece or cotton. On days where we don't leave the house, the cotton ones are perfect! I can't believe I just admitted that occassionally I let my child stay in PJ's all day, but I did also say we didn't leave the house when that happens! :)
Gentlemen, do not for a moment think that my Gurudeva wants to put a complete brake on the modern civilization—an impossible feat. But let us learn from him the art of making the best use of a bad bargain, and let us understand the importance of this human life, which is fit for the highest development of true consciousness. The best use of this rare human life should not be neglected. As it is said in the Śrīmad-Bhāgavatam (11.9.29):
Taylor chortled. “What, Tawnya? No way.”
Daisy is afraid of cows. But I think once she has a few minutes to warm up to the situation (ok . . . maybe a bit more than a few minutes) she'll be fine about it.
"I love this so much I think I want to marry it," I had announced as I slipped my knife in time and time again, stretching the culinary experience out for an hour or more. Sauteed mushrooms, summer salad with feta cheese and olive oil, corn on the cob, roasted potatoes... it was all good but nothing held my attention the way Mr. Sirloin did.
Whenever I go home and see all the people I used to know, there are 3 questions that are asked. Without fail.
Its ride quality is well soundproofed, allowing us to get more horsepower and 254 foot-pounds of torque. When SH-AWD is the acura mdx prototype is beyond reproach, both inside and out. Amenities are aplenty, as is expected in the acura mdx 2006 redesign of four. The thing is, it suffers from the 2000 acura mdx of performance-minded drivers.
How does this ignore the message from the source? The entire purpose of the Count of Monte Cristo is the simple message: two wrongs don’t make a right. Hell, even The Simpsons had a better understanding of the novel than the film.
He's going to skew the data. SPS is going to be scratching their heads like, "How come kids are still fat when they're taking a gazillion steps before 9:00 a.m.?"
at a theme park. This was no theme park. This was
Richard Barnbook: Will the new Mayor repudiate his predecessor's plan in respect of Black cab drivers by positively discriminating in favour of members of some ethnic groups over other ethnic groups through a scheme (the BAME and knowledge programme) run by the London Development Agency set up in October last year?
The screech of feedback on a microphone
While the serenity was nice while it lasted, I am glad to be back home with my little firecracker, even if the serenity is a bit lacking for the time being.
“Label jars, not people.” Labels belong on shelves, in closets, cupboards, or storage rooms, people do not.
I know these colors aren't typical 'girl' room colors, but I'm not a typical girl. I do plan on accenting the room with pops of a bright, deep pink...almost like a purplish pink, to add a little more feminineness to the space. I've got big plans...if only I can keep up my energy level!
Sorry, I don’t do spoilers.
In the spirit of demystifying this process of selling any website, big or small, I’ve developed a list 4 simple things that are key to selling digital assets such as sites and apps. It’s important to note that we don’t need all 4 to make a sale, very often just 1 of these will suffice.
Let’s take a look at the facts. More than half of all marriages will end up with a divorce. And quite a few of all married men and all married women will have an affair. And you can bet that most of these people are doing the standard things that all others do when it comes to what they try to create attraction. Does that really sound like it is an effective strategy?
John Mason, SNP
Seat 6: SirLinderoth ($24.40 in chips)
The circus I worked for employed both a doctor and a vet, and I could choose to visit either one. I generally preferred the vet, who was an amiable eccentric called Hugo “Smacker” Ramrod, so named because of his predilection for whacking horses on the rump after treating them. Smacker was a cheerful young fellow who hummed stirring tunes, such as Men of Harlech, while treating his patients. He had no qualms about sticking his fist up an animal’s rear end, which seemed to happen quite often in the line of duty. He knew better than to try any of those tricks on me, of course. I usually went to him for dental treatment, and he was always very careful to tell me what he was doing before he did it. We had a good relationship based on mutual respect and a certain amount of fear (on his part).
KG How have life experiences made an impression on your music and yourself as an artist?
Green pants can be a little intimidating to wear because it can be overwhelming to pick a shirt and a pair of shoes that goes well with it. I recommend picking a dark color because I feel that dark color pants are easier to pull off than bright green ones. Also, picking a dark color can transition well into other seasons such as the Fall. For your top, pair it with a white tee and layered jewelry to make it more fun or you can be daring and pair it with a patterned blouse like I did above. The shoes can be simple or you can wear it with a fun printed heel. For example, cheetah print would look great with cuffed green jeans.
It's not without it's up side, of course, aside from pleasure. One of the reasons why sex with girls is a "big deal," particularly among the younger sets just getting their hormones revving, is that pregnancy is a very real concern. Disease is, too, but, let's face it, most people don't think it can happen to them (which is, sadly, how they get spread), else the pill would not be such a popular method. A girl's got to be (or at least ought to be) careful who she, eh, spreads her legs for because, even today, the bulk of the onus and responsibility for the end results she bears. That particular boogeyman, getting someone pregnant, does not apply in homosexual cases. Disease, however, still does.
So, I have decided that before people lose interest and tire of waiting for it, I will unveil it now. I will continue to tweak it as I go along, much like I did this one.
Guess what, I don’t want to do any of it.
If that wasn't enough, Grace become the first Irish-American and Catholic mayor in an age where when many city residents still distrusted Catholics. In fact, Republican opponents had claimed that Grace would "make this City subordinate to the Holy Father in Rome."
Sprout’s a complex character and, as such, it’s difficult to form a bond with him. He’s extremely intelligent, quick witted and sarcastic but his personality strikes a fine line between funny and derisive and, at times, he’s not very likeable at all.
Genre: Drama,Action
Planning a boycott is conceptually simple: your goal is to organize as wide a coalition as possible, so you can generate thousands of complaints to the offending company. You should contact all groups that have a reason to censure the company, including reasons other than your own. Following such a recruitment effort, the standard practice is to arrange a conference call with representatives from the various groups. For example, the strategy of the Free Burma Coalition (now reconstituted as the United States Campaign for Burma), which conducted dozens of successful boycotts against companies doing business in Burma, was as follows:
SS: Lots of beginning screenwriters focus on getting a script purchased. Lots of purchased screenwriters focus on getting a script made. In your experience, what’s the difference between a script that’s good enough to get bought and a script that’s good enough to get produced?
Seriously people? Why? Thats so stupid and counterintuitive! Stupid, Stupid, Stupid. I blame America.
I took a nap when we got home, and then once I got up, The Guy massaged my neck and shoulders and pretty much cure my migraine. I went out and planted most of my garden and then The Guy and I ate together, before he went off with a friend to play pool.
*watches Star Wars*
When I was using ToDo and ToodleDo, I was also using the iPhone’s built-in calendar app for personal appointments. I had another system on my server, Calcium, on which I kept my work appointments. Calcium is cool because you can configure it to allow anyone to add an event so long as that block of time was free. So any student could book time with me without logging in or jumping through any other hoops. The problem with this was (a) most students didn’t make an appointment – they just dropped in, and (b) I had to “sync” Calcium and my iPhone calendar by hand, copying appointments manually when needed. This led to more scheduling malfunctions than I would have liked.
but it’s something I have to do, for myself
2009 Golden Flight (Fell 1st); Fleet Street (UR 18th) Barry Geraghty
Both teams eventually submitted revised versions of their research to a U.S. biosecurity panel. That group and, later, federal health officials agreed to support publication. For one thing, the panel said, it would be difficult for others to do harm using the data provided, and for another, scientists had good reasons for publishing the results.
Addison Lea Brown:
Turkish women wax their body hair as culturally body hair on women is considered unclean. They wax *everything*. I asked my friend about the practice, she said that she waxed everything in the past, even her arms. She gave me a recommendation for a waxer. Then she demonstrated the depth of her friendship. She called, made my appointment (I did not have the necessary Turkish vocabulary,) and then told me she would meet me there to translate what I wanted to the esthetician. She did say I was on my own for the waxing--which is best for our friendship considering the positions I had to assume.
I have used only tanning booster oils before and they leave skin really sticky so this lotion was a positive experience for me!
The problem with companies pushing the pride of excellent customer service is that over the years, especially in the crippled economy, they are doing more and more for the customers. In theory it's great. But the mantra of "we will do whatever it takes to exceed your expectations" invites more people taking advantage and creating more commonplace customer insolence.
Initially, the texts were about ‘school stuff and random events and then the texts progressed into talking about problems the two of them were having and deeper conversations.’
Unfortunately, she is has had some very heart-breaking news and I do send her my most heart-felt condolences at this time....
Sea salt & pepper
There are five sandhill cranes at Blacktail Ponds when we pull into the pullout for lunch. One walks across a frozen expanse of ice and four in the sage on the far side. Three fly off. We chew on our veggies and ham sandwiches. It is cozy in the car, away from the few errant snowflakes which whiz down through the grey sky.
Now do the same thing with the top of the body. I shirred 3 rows at the top and then left about 1.5" of space before the next series of 3 started. You can use an erasable marking pen or chalk to mark your next starting line (do this before you start any shirring), but I've got a screw hole on my machine that I just held my fabric up to, giving me the desired width.
On behalf of The Orangepress I put a handful of questions to Sebastian Hardie’s Mario Millo prior to posting this review. Here are his responses:
People have absolutely no right to surgically alter their children’s genitals against their will without medical purpose, and this goes for male, female, or intersexed children as far as I’m concerned. Every person has the right to completely intact genitals. Male and female circumcision, intersex sexual assignment, etc. is all fucking bullshit without merit in today’s world, quite frankly, and it sickens me that the practices still continue and it sickens me even more that doctors keep making up bogus “health benefits” to ALL of these procedures (male genital mutilation being the most common defended, though sometimes female is as well).
Until tomorrow ...
(530) 893-3520
"Kate I asked a question." Ted says,
Not only do I not want to be zapped by as much radiation as a chest x-ray for no apparent reason, I also don’t want to be groped by anyone..except my husband.
Working woman: all about saturated fat amounts versus unsaturated fat.
4:00 PM Baby Steinberg
So, Drew goes to see his sister...and he doesn't get home until after midnight...which means it's then TOO late to make our video.
I would have jumped right in and swam around. It was warm water. And contrary to the way it looked, it wasn't stinky.
The reason I bring up some of this historical information now is because of these two verses, particularly verse 11. We assume John has penned a fairly chronological description of Jesus ministry, although perhaps not as truly chronological as the other three because his purpose is not to lay out a historical account as much as an argument for his divinity.
Here's the plan:
Blot eggplant dry with a paper towel. Brush on both sides with a Tbsp oil. Grill or broil, turning once, until brown and softened, 6-8 minutes total. Set aside to cool slightly, then coarsely chop.
August 29th will always be a day that I never forget. I had just moved back to DC less than 2 weeks before to start grad school and in the days before August 29th, I’d spent my time getting my schedule together, unpacking my apartment and convincing my family that I understood we’d never left for a hurricane before, but this time seemed like as good as any to get the hell out of dodge. The problem was that my dad wanted to take my mom, my sisters, and my grandparents (my mom’s parents) to Northern LA where my dad was from and his parents still lived; but my grandmother didn’t want to leave her house and without her agreeing to leave, my grandfather wouldn’t leave and thus my mom wouldn’t leave (and neither my sisters)… so I was tasked with convincing a 70 year old woman that she needed to go. Thank God I did. I didn’t realize it then, but it was just one of the miracles that God would perform during this trying time.
Do you know someone special that you'd like to acknowledge? Don't be shy--come join us and celebrate! Send them an email, give them a shout out, or show your appreciation in another way. Kindness makes the world go round. :)
Cups are also relationship cards, this is a good card, it shows that your relationships are strong. Your love is strong too. It also shows happiness in community and relationships. So your past looks good.
I really do love it. It is leather so it smells amazing, will last for ages and as it's black no doubt it will go with everything, both smart and casual. There's absolutely loads of room inside for the array of items I like to carry round with me.
It is written in Arabic, Armenian, Hindi, German, Korean, Russian, Portuguese, Thai.... it is written in 20 different languages!! I do wonder if someone would actually show up able to speak every language, but I'm sure a phone call could be made
since this information has been made available from the start 1998 is amazingly
Have an excellent an wonderful week!
unsayable impression from the page
Mike: 3.0
THAT'S a fucking measure. Whoever thought 25cl is an amount worth paying for is a MOTHERFUCKER.
At the same time, we first world commentators on movies, books, and the like, risk irrelevance - at least in some circumstances - if we adopt what we might characterize as the "Adorno approach." Like with Pierre Bourdieu, Theodor Adorno's massive body of work is now relegated to a placeholder status for the puritanical position that "culture industries are always bad, no matter how revolutionary they appear." And the implied shorthand addendum to this position is that Adorno was wrong, because he "didn't like jazz," and as we know, jazz is the great American artform. Ergo, one must at all costs avoid being an Adorno - this can be a serious offense in the high court of internet intelligentsia. It causes more vitriol, at times, than the aerial bombing of hospitals and civilian neighborhoods...
There are few things as satisfying as a profoundly bad movie. This weekend was filled with them: The Last Exorcism, Jaws 2, and Jaws 3. We are saving the motherload, Jaws: The Revenge, possibly for this evening.
The mother: She was shot first while sitting in front of the computer in the TV-room. She was shot twice, but the fatal shot was presumably caused by a shot fired in the back of her head.
Drivers in the Western world need to loosen up and have a little fun. Having lived in the U.S. for ten years, I was often a frustrated driver because I knew I could get from A to B in a better way if it weren’t for all those enforced restrictions, and the other drivers adhering to it. America is supposed to be the land of the free! Yet most drivers are so concerned about stoplights and turn lanes, it takes the sport out of it!
If you don't already know I have been only blogging since last June to kinda make a scrapbook for my out of town family to visit!! But they don't come and visit as much as I would like, (rude, I know!!) but since I loved blogging I thought about expanding my horizons!! If that makes sense!! :)
I received my free image for doing the challenge...
During said special birthday outing at the toy store, I found myself feeling especially tired. At first I tried to convince myself that I was just feeling the effects of a stressful week. Until the manager discovered me rolled up in a ball on the floor next to the train table in a cold sweat while my child ran the train. Fever, chills, exhaustion and by the end of the night I could not swallow from the pain. Urgent care. Strep throat. I missed seeing the Lorax with the birthday boy. The husband said it was good. I was too delirious to care.
I was reminded of this yet again yesterday, so I thought it would be good to highlight an example of what we call news and public discourse, masking the real story. The Head of the South Central Region for the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) resigned this week over words taken from his speech two years ago in Dish, Texas. The site will become more relevant as more of the story is told. Al Armendariz’ resigned over remarks made in the speech saying he would “crucify” companies for not adhering to compliance with the EPA standards. From what I have read, he has been a good public servant and was a good champion for the EPA who has been historically held at bay by lobbying efforts of the various industries they try to patrol.
The infamous New York fire in late 1835 drew people’s attention to the need to provide for sudden and large losses, and the financial panic of 1837 spurred a move toward mutualization for upstart life insurance companies. By the mid-1840s, life insurance was beginning to experience its first boom period, with many companies still around today first surfacing within a 30-year period. The company that would become New York Life was started in 1845; same for National Life Insurance Company in 1848; MassMutual in 1851; Northwestern Mutual in 1857; Equitable (now AXA Equitable) in 1859; Guardian Life in 1860; John Hancock in 1862; MetLife in 1864; Union Central in 1867; Pacific Life in 1868; Genworth Financial in 1871; and Prudential in 1875.
All because yes, one gets pockmarks on one’s face when one has the chickenpox (YEAH I’M NOT GOING TO SAY ‘MY’ FACE SPECIFICALLY, SO GO AWAY AND SUCK IT). ughhh omg can’t believe I got OWNED by a random small kid! Hate kids. Will never fathom the thought of ruining my flat tummy (now almost concave inwards, thanks to terrible diet of PLAIN PORRIDGE AND WATER for the past seven days) to pop out babies.
The wise old Chief Topiawari whom he met later on the Orinoco, and who became Ralegh's true friend, could only explain hard facts by such imagery, which Ralegh delighted to note down for their natural poetry...
I work at a residential treatment center. A place for girls who have been removed from their homes and need therapy and time before they can go back or be adopted. As you can imagine we deal with a lot of anger there. Until this morning the worst thing that has happened has been threats, posturing, yelling. That sort of thing.
He said: “It was natural for the accused Bibi Jagir Kaur to have been greatly upset… because the exposure of Harpreet’s pregnancy would have ruined her political career…. The accused having attained such an important political and religious stature could not afford to lose her status ”. The Judge further added: “Bibi Jagir Kaur, who was against the marriage of Harpreet Kaur with Kamaljit Singh, who was a commoner, having no social and political reckoning, had the motive to terminate the Harpreet’s pregnancy in order to safeguard her political career and also her high social and religious status as the SGPC president”.
Cost so far: 134 gold
Here's what happened: Since we were at the end of our subtraction unit, I knew that I had more worksheets than I would ever truly need. So I decided that I would go through the workbook pages on my computer and just print a variety of worksheets- just maybe three or four of each one, but stick with differences from nine, for example. That way, everyone would be getting the same equations, but would still feel like they had some control over what they were going to work on, and what they might like to color if they finish it in a timely manner. I just made sure that I printed enough for the whole class, plus a couple of extras.
He put the child on the backseat. It was a one-year-old boy. He folded up the stroller, and I put it in the trunk.
The station was not as full as expected, but the train was and me and Myrte enjoyed the train to Amsterdam sitting on the stairs (the trains are double deckerd so they have stairs!). Some people got off at an earlier station whilst we got off at Centraal. A sea of orange awaited us, we got a map from a lady and walked towards Dam Square.
Did you know, spider’s and other insect for that matter actually have “blue” blood. Which can roughly translate to a transparent-y look if you ever had the chance to even look at their blood. Why? The lack of hemoglobin inside of it.
Don't give it all away,
All that being said, if you enjoy a good Punisher story, and enjoy John's art, I highly recommend this book.
This chapter ends the fight of rikuo together with the kyushu clan against the black dressed Gokkaidon, Hiruko. The previous chapter showed Tsuchigumo entering the fight and helped rikuo.. in this chapter it was shown that rikuo do “Matoi” with tsuchigumo (tsurara noticed it) and that attack defeat him. Also they stated that in the end, the Gokkaidon who lived for a long time until now with the aid of their forbidden magic, are succeptible to death as well.
Critics insist the grassy plot at 46th Ave. and 164th St. will lack the appearance of a cemetery without headstones, which were eliminated after the city built a playground on the site in 1936.
misfortune, by contrast, is a dark power,
Those points aside, I have learnt things from this book. Like details of the F-duct system, the Front Flap Adjuster and a wealth of smaller facts. There isn’t a better book on the contemporary F1 car. In particular the CAD drawings and close-up photos, just simply aren’t in the public domain. From the pictures we got over the race weekends, we never get to see half the hardware and design work that’s pictured in this book. So I’ll keep this book on hand for reference for several seasons to come.
69. Was it love at first sight, or should I walk by again?
As good as this book is, it is in some ways dwarfed by the accomplishment of Yokoyama's other collection, Travel, which is quite simply stunning in the way it takes a simple set-up and single-mindedly examines every facet of the experience. The book silently follows several passengers — looking much like the silly heroes of the "Combats" stories — on a lengthy train trip. And that's it. A bunch of guys stride purposefully onto a train, wander through its corridors looking for a seat, gaze absentmindedly out the windows, perhaps plot conspiracies that are never enacted, then disembark at the end. It's all stylized and exaggerated so that every least little action is magnified, and Yokoyama nearly makes an action extravaganza out of the most prosaic material. It is also a book deeply attuned to sensual and sensory experiences, boasting one of the most beautiful sequences in all of comics, when the train passes through a storm and its aftermath, and the play of shadows, and of light reflecting off water, creates a few pages of near-abstract design that has to be seen to be believed. [buy] | [buy]
Last night I thought a little homemade goodness was in order and would do us all some good. I whipped up a batch of creamy chicken and rice soup and tried out a new recipe for sweet potato biscuits I'd seen on my blogging buddy Jo-Anna's blog, A Pretty Life in the Suburbs. If you haven't visited before, you should! She has tons of amazing recipes, lots of great diy's and decorating posts too. Not to mention professional quality photos. All in all a fabulous blog!
On April 24th, Grandma had her complete hip replacement done. She was released to a rehab hospital the following Friday (4-27) and on May 3rd, Grandma was transported by ambulance to the ER for chest pain. After ruling stuff out, she was DX as having suffered a mild heart attack. She went back to the rehab hospital on the 5th and has been there ever since. No one knows when she'll be able to go home. Every one says it's up to some one else. It's CRAZY.... just give us a straight answer. PERIOD.
Sport can bring out the best in people, but also the worst.
I took so many pictures to capture the colors, so just a warning. All but two are in the shade because the colors stand out more. I used my mom's camera since mine is dead and it's much better quality.
Also check Netflix if you have it, a lot of great films on Prehistoric animals. Cave of Dreams is also a good one to watch.
When your pastor gets to that level of anointedness, look out. It’s time for him to start regularly scheduling the miracles! If you think I’m exaggerating, think again. Even the Apostle Paul and the 1st Century Christians weren’t this anointed. Oh, sure, they did miracles by the power of God. But even they couldn’t make a “miracle reservation” and invite everybody to come “receive their healing” at an appointed time of their own choosing. Look at what Paul told Timothy:
Meanwhile South Africa’s 20-million citizens living in abject poverty have suggested to Shiceka that “if he wants to keep saying ‘F*ck you’ to the poor, there are cheaper ways of doing it”.
After that meeting we started hanging out almost every day. I was helping him with work at his church or he was helping me raise money for missions. As it got closer and closer to Christmas we worked at 'toy town' in the mall wrapping gifts for their customers. There weren't many customers though, so we had lots of time to talk & get to know each other. And after 2 or 3 weeks, we both just knew we were gonna get married. Not the traditional love story, but it was great :)
Such has been the essence of the enduring relationship between BlueScope Steel and the Wollongong Conservatorium of Music – two seemingly unrelated bodies mutually bound for a quarter of a century through the BlueScope Steel Youth Orchestra - in pursuit not only of giving (mainly) teenagers something worthwhile to do, but of all-round excellence.
Honestly I was happy, but more for Cindi than me. The zone, the focus, the not really “feeling” anything emotion at that point (sorry Chris, probably wasn’t as welcoming as I could have been, but I think he got it).
Section 5 – Sermon rough drafts are due Friday.
PRPS Noir also has some very cool woven sportshirts, a denim chore coat like the one above, and other tops in the collection, with each piece being very unique in its make, model, fabrication, and treatment. Look closely and you’ll see that the chore coat above utilizes several different fabrics.
"This is surprisingly nuanced so early in the run." ... "Is it running too hot now?" ... "This would be nice over a cube of ice." ... "Some time in the wood and I think we've got a real winner." ... "Speaking of ice, do we have any? This really needs to be cooled down." ...
7. “Ain’t Fit to Live Here” by Graveyard
Is it difficult?
Whether it was slacks and sweater, mother of the bride, lunch out or Sunday lunch with the family; she always looked immaculate.
And guys, you can hang out there too. Its not just for girls. :)
Melting Pot (bonus if you have a melting pot liner = less clean up!)
Metanoia by Churchwood
Love Laura x
...but I think I loved most how he beautifully portrayed Venice as if it was a character in itself...
Thanks Molly, Cathy, and Julie of Bering's Hardware.
I had a health scare earlier in May, which really gave me a bit of a shock. After tests (mammogram and ultrasound) it turned out to be something quite common. (and easily treated that day).It was such a relief!
So, the fact is that we still have good people in the country. It is just that they are crushed. Why? Because we Indians are too chickened to come out on the streets and support someone who is doing it.
He shall live for ever.
I usually put my Christmas tree up on the day after Thanksgiving. I was a Christmas tree perfectionist. I placed an ornament on the tree, then stood back to see if it looked ok. It took me hours to decorate the tree. I popped popcorn days earlier, because stale popcorn is easier to string. I would sit and string popcorn for a very long time. I also made my own 30 foot garland by cutting strips of material and tying it onto a jute rope. My tree was beautiful if I may say so myself. My children would be home, out of school for a few days over Thanksgiving, so I thought I would start our very own holiday tradition. I believe this began when they were six or seven years old.
Always the Designer, Never the Bride is the third book in the Emma Rae Creations Series. We briefly met Carly at the end of Always the Wedding Planner when she was starting her wedding. Her best friend Audrey is a dress designer and has made her dress for her. This installment focuses on Audrey as she and her friends Kat and Carly, are forced to deal with some pretty big life issues and decisions. At first I had a hard time getting into the story, but there’s enough humor, along with the drama, to make you want to keep going. All the old characters are back as well to guide the newcomers along.
Hi Magnolia Lovers,
'Or if the sun is shining you could measure the height of the barometer, then set it on end and measure the length of its shadow. Then you measure the length of the skyscraper's shadow, and thereafter it is a simple matter of proportional arithmetic to work out the height of the skyscraper.'
The CCC logo of Campus Crusade for Christ is on the right shoulder and the Jesus Film ‘Jesus’ on the left hand shoulder. The front of the shirt carries the Chilean Flag with the words ‘Gracias Senor’ (Thank you Lord!)
It's been a week since I last posted, and in this week, A LOT has happened. There's been the regular insanity of juggling university, babysitting, dance, homework, life in general, etc etc etc, but we also got a whole 'nother bucket of insanity dumped on our heads.
5) Screaming and yelling at your children does not have long term/lasting effects on them.
You see, I think about this kind of epidemic quite often. How would I cope with Armageddon? Would I be strong enough to survive? I'm not sure if I am physically fit enough to run from or fight off a pack of zombies. I really need to get into shape. It isn't just about losing weight but it is more about becoming strong. I want to be strong in every sense of the word: mentally, emotionally, spiritually and physically.
there is a new
We went to recovery and Reese went with us. I loved that. Jonathan went to share the news with our family in the waiting room. They had all predicted time of birth and whether it was a boy or girl. My brother got it right on with 5:28 and a girl! ha I look extremely tired but this was the best feeling ever, having her lay with me after she was born!!
After training for a 1/2 marathon I found myself smack-dab in the middle of a rapidly developing bout with plantar fascitis. As I began to “rehabilitate” my foot (only my left – which was interesting) I began to feel overwhelmed by the “opinions” and “facts” thrown around on running blogs and news articles.
So I was able to talk to an online friend of mine and she is going to be helping us with educational stuff. This morning she sent me an email with a link to something she thought I'd be interested in. Her Alma Mater has some great great online courses and there just happens to be one for Marketing Your Nonprofit.
This, I maintain, isn't trolling, this is a statement of the current reality. Whether or not people like it is moot. The only difference is context, I acknowledged it long ago, and the people who foolishly spent their money on that 4e shite aren't ready to let go. That's the only difference.
Here is my new page.
Clean and slice the chicken thighs into small bite size pieces and marinate with yoghurt, coriander powder, chilli powder and curry powder for about 1/2 an hour or if you have time, longer in the refrigerator.
The morally cosy vision allows the embrace of monstrosity only as a reaction to suffering or as an act of rage against the Almighty. Vampire interviewee Louis is in despair at his brother’s death when he accepts Lestat’s offer. Frankenstein’s creature is driven to violence by the violence done to him. Even Lucifer’s rebellion emerges from the agony of injured pride. The message is clear: By all means become an abomination – but only while unhinged by grief or wrath. […] The mere desire to stay alive, in whatever form you’re lumbered with – werewolf, vampire, Father of Lies – really couldn’t be considered a morally sufficient rationale. And yet here [he] was, staying alive. You love life because life’s all there is.
September 26: The Agenzia Italiana del Farmaco (Italian Drug Agency, equivalent to the FDA) warned against use of older (tricyclic) antidepressants in people under 18 years old. It also determined the drugs were associated with heart attacks in people of any age.
I had no problem planting this--only took 2-3 hours to get it all in the ground... we planted 3x the garden as last year on purpose. I expected to lose a few plants and eat more veggies and give more away--but finding 2+ hours a week to work in the garden doesn't sound like much, but it is really hard to find the time recently
Lastly, I just read that John Buchanan, the Director of the FAMSF (both Legion and De Young) died yesterday of cancer.
While these are all incredible smokes for cigars lovers (with still a lot to offer, given that they are still quite young cigars) I overall love the BHK 52 and I have been saying often to my friends that this is probably my favorite amongst the Behike, a reasonably short and incredibly punchy smoke, rich of aroma and coffee flavour.
This book has so much going for it, there is so much to admire and love here. It has everything (including its fair share of heartache.) This is a book that will draw you in and will not let you go.
Smiles are uncharmed and desires are disarmed,
Every cloud and all that.
The Savage Return of Dracula #1 (Marvel) Gene Colan file copy – signed in red by Gene) – winner (kjo)
And yet, ever so slightly, I can feel summer drawing to a close.
The general principles applicable to damages claims can be summarised as follows:
Its so easy to blame us teenagers by declaring that we are all the same, ruining businesses, governments complaining about the youth of today. If you are so eager to get us off the streets…GIVE US SOMETHING TO DO! Think of it this way, the places that we can go to that don’t cost a lot of money like parks and cafes we are getting kicked out of , why you ask? Because we are simply teenagers. As a result of job cuts and high tax’s our parents simply cant afford to always give us money to go to places like the cinema or amusement parks. Also for those of you saying to teenagers go get a job, it aint that simple when you are competing with honours graduates from the top university who are also unemployed. Also since we are probably the main source of money the businesses have between clothes shops, food stores, restaurants, book and c.d stores, i think they would more than likely have a drop in sales if us teenagers were to suddenly stop going outside.
Walker Sands Communications is a company in Chicago that has a specific department that works with entertainment PR. Their mission statement is to, “Provide best-in-class marketing communications counsel and services.” The serve a variety of clients from different industries they have categorized. They serve clients in industries from healthcare to real estate. They do marketing, websites, blogs, podcasts, event planning and coordinating, crisis management, media relations and other services. They have done work with many popular celebrities, super models, and musicians.
Like my grandparents and parents before me, I was a generation that worked for everything. Allowance wasn't given, it was earned. If you wanted more than enough for a weekly candy bar or a soda from your allowance, you worked extra to earn it. Washing the car was 50 cents, waxing it a buck. Pulling weeds, a quarter a bucket and it was a big bucket. We honored our word and respected our parents, our veterans and our flag. If we didn't, there were consequences.
There are two ways to start the bread: either by proofing (fast) or by using a poolish (slow). I used the poolish method, but either is fine.
The way things are going, I’m terrified that in a few years my degree will be completely useless because of where it came from. I suppose I kind of already do feel that way.
‘Start your saying where you left off with the event horizon … ’
It wasn't too sweet. But it was nice and moist. I loved the flakes of almonds scattered throughout the cake. Every bite had lovely texture.
Holding hands in hands,
Yesterday I shared one way I asked a friend to be one of my bridesmaids. Asking friends and family to be part of our wedding party was fun (although it took me long enough - sorry to my sister and Maid of Honour who was patiently waiting to begin planning) I really enjoyed thinking of different ways to ask them.
Only-Three-Months-Until-Halloween July EHAG Emporium
4) Those who argue that it would take a huge number of people to support a conspiracy such as what is being suggested might wish to consider how many people there are in their own lives, no matter how closely they work or play with them, whose circumstances of birth they could genuinely claim to know the full details of. In general we believe what people tell us, that is assuming we ever even ask the question. When it comes to the President of the United States there would have to be more, but actually given the circumstances of the Obama presidency, it is quite possible that there would not have to be a huge number of people.
I know nothing about Geraldo 1969 who I'm going to assume were a session ensemble put together by the Morgan Studios team. The Morgan label itself was of course owned by the recording studios of the same name, and failed to produce any hits at all during its existence. We've covered its history in a bit more depth elsewhere, and the compilation "House of Many Windows" is well worth tracking down, highlighting as it does some marvellous pieces of psychedelic pop which came out of that stable at the time.
So my 25th Birthday is just a couple days away now, and I already know what two of my gifts are... Already know the girls at work are going to decorate my desk and shove a ton of confetti everywhere. I'll be pulling out "happy birthday" glitter until my 26th lol.
Buy two tofu packets and keep one in the fridge. It lasts forever and makes pulling this recipe together very easy, as there are no extra trips to the shops required.
July 4 – Sunshine Festival 5K, St. Simons Island, GA 29:39
I don’t know about you guys but I’m pretty happy with that win. I was at work for most of the game and so was only able to follow the score and I have to say, just seeing those little numbers increase here and there with no other real frame of reference is pretty nerve wracking. It wasn’t until I got home and watched the replay that I was able to really appreciate our defensive performance.
How I rate it
Today I have decided to review two very tasty adult beverages: the 120 Carmenere from Santa Rita, Chile and the White Rascal Belgian-style white ale from Avery Brewing (Boulder, CO). Both were so good I couldn’t decide which to tell you about…. so I chose both.
I am cool.
A slow, muscled turn at the surface made me blink. Did I just see that?
"52 lunges across the bridge, 52 weeks in the year, 52 playing cards, 4 suits in a deck, 4 seasons in a year, 4 symbols. If I was to lay a card on each week I would give each suit a season, laying the aces on each equinox and solstice. What suit would I give each season? Well, obviously spring would be hearts, summer clubs, fall spades, and winter diamonds. Whoa. Why do I say obviously?" . . . and the conversation continued in my head as ran:
“So I had a nice first impression then. That explains a lot! And if it helps, that cuts you out from the creepy zone”
Translated, this reads ‘If jealous Juno had seen the swimming of the bull, she would with greater justice gone to the halls of Aeolius’ and alludes to Virgil’s Aeneid in which Juno (Jupiter’s wife) demands that Aeolius, god of the wind, drowns Aeneas’ fleet at sea; here though it is used to refer to Jupiter’s abduction of Europa in Ovid’s Metamorphoses.
Mr Dawkins had backed up his claim by saying that the proportion of people identifying themselves as Christians had plunged from 72 per cent to just 54 per cent in the past ten years. He said the findings supported his contention that all signs of religion in British public life should be removed, along with Christian opposition to social changes such as gay marriage and assisted suicide.
His film caused me to get outside of myself, to contemplate a cinematic world much richer and larger than anything I’d previously understood. I think his films are all, to one degree or another, stories of expanding self-awareness, of births of new ways of communication and potential. His work set me on the path of consuming every kind of film I could in hopes of fitting it into my suddenly-refreshed and unfathomably, dauntingly broad view of cinema.
Sadly, we say goodbye to our wonderful DT buddy Jackie, who is taking some time out to try some new things, she's going to be hugely missed by all her DT buddies, but she knows there will always be a team position here for her if she feels like coming back at any time. Wishing you all the very best Jackie, and thank you xxx
I hate spam...
On the other hand the soup was very good – a hearty mix of pasta, beans and a little bit of meat for flavoring in a nice broth. This was a good size portion and would be great on a cooler evening at Epcot.
5) WD Wisconsin - 50%
Basically, we don't know what is going to happen, and probably an expert with sufficient information to make a more likely scenario (than others) isn't motivated to disclose his thoughts, as there is no gain in taking a position that is moderate. All the possible gain -- to one's career -- can only come from foreseeing reasonable dangers and prioritizing them and suggesting ways to mitigate or eliminate such dangers. In other words, by thinking of possible catastrophes, and recommending appropriate actions to reduce the likelihood or the consequences of such possibilities.
The matter of the rights of soldiers to express their political views has gained attention with the incident involving sergeant Gary Stein. Stein created an Armed Forces Tea Party page on Facebook back in 2010 and posted a comment on the site saying, roughly, ”I say screw Obama. I will not follow orders given by him to me.” As might be imagined, this seems to be a violation of Article 134 of the Uniform Code of Military Justice in regards to things that are “prejudicial to good order and discipline.” In reply, Stein said that he meant that he will not follow an illegal order, which is quite another matter.
View from the northeast.
and smiles like daisies
I should add in that this post was originally written on 11-22 but I'm only getting back to it today 11-30. Yeah life is a tad crazy right now.
John had his mentor and friend out there with us and I really enjoyed finally meeting him. He did some one on one drills with us after the formal part of the class was over. He helped me fine tune my distance shooting and offered some advice on dealing with a bad guy encounter. He, like John, is very calming. He talked about front sight and trigger manipulation. John claims he has mentioned that before, but I don't recall ever hearing it:) There is something missing in my application of sight alignment for distance shooting. I swear I do the same exact stuff at 25 yards as I do at 15, but I can't seem to shoot where I want. My shots are always low. Mostly good groups, but low.
Reading about Jesus flipping the tables made me think of dinosaur comics. (I can’t help it.) This story in Matthew is a little different; in Matthew, we only see the fig tree once; we don’t come back to it for the moral of the story later like we do in Mark. Matthew spends time describing Jesus’ healing and teaching activities in the temple after he’s driven out all the merchants and moneylenders. Mark never discusses that at all.
While giving full credence to her Inner Guides contact, I did notice that convoluted “save the world” message. A dangerous, delusional message, as it can inflate the ego of an unwary seeker who would think she is so special and Messiah in stature.
Downfall symbolises the Manichean view of the case: good versus evil, light versus darkness. According to Downfall, no person who defended Sheridan did so for good reason: they were either stunningly naive or self-serving plotters. Those who testified against him, even those who were paid to do so, were credible, believable even. No middle ground, no shades of grey are even considered.
I spend every day being thankful that I have a life that includes enough. Enough everything - health, food, shelter, safety, unnecessary material things, whatever. I get to wake up healthy next to my healthy husband listening to my healthy babies babbling (or sometimes crying at me) over their monitors. Then I have the energy and resources to spend each day with this beautiful family, raising these two precious little people. All of this is nothing less than amazing. With all that is scary, painful, and horrific in this world...I get this life. I don't know why I am this privileged, but I choose not to take it for granted.
And with him his wife, Eve
Everything you are becoming
Like when I'm on a deadline. And I'm on the 12th rub out of the poor kid's head. I start to wail and cry and gnash teeth and say how I'm going to go back to retail sales and live a life of quiet, hopeless, desperate mediocrity because, well damnit, I can't paint one kid?! How did I think I was suppose to be an artist???
Dusty In Bloom Champagne Kisses DA0801
After purchasing this pomade, I felt buyers remorse. Why? Not entirely because I spent more money on this mickey-mouse sized pomade than I would on Dax which contains 7 times more; it was because I am against using petroleum containing pomade. “But TSP”, one might say” its FKN Mr. Ducktail’s own pomade; Rebel Rouser loves it, and at the very least the tin looks freakin’ sick”… yes, this is true. This slick smells good, as it is cola scented.
Has anyone tried using StumbleUpon? It’s like a discovery engine or web search engine that recommends sites/web pages videos, photos and more, based on users interests.
I think we think that we live so differently to others, sometimes thinking that we are the first to do things, not realising that others are living lives somewhat similar apart from the odd decision.
I'm not doing much baking this year, yet... but here is a re-post from last year with some of my favorite cookie recipes. Let me know if you try any of them, or comment back with YOUR favorite cookie recipe!
No, Sutherland hasn't become obsessed with patterns like his son on the show. Touch tells the story of Martin Bohm (Sutherland), a once promising journalist who's now a widower unloading baggage at JFK. His 11-year-old special-needs son, Jake (David Mazouz), scribbles strangely prescient numbers into notebooks but has never uttered a word. In each episode of the drama, Jake connects those numbers to seemingly unrelated people and situations all over the world in ways that totally freak out his dad and his social worker. Meanwhile, Jake loses it if anyone touches him or his book of numbers.
02. Going Under
This assembly story is about free choice and friendship. It is linked to the SEAL (Social and Emotional Aspects of Learning) theme of Problem Solving.
NYC
We may be away from our family and friends
3 cheese macaroni and cheese
Then there are all the slightly older kids repeating the patterns of their parents. Getting pregnant outside of marriage, having abortions, etc, etc. That is a vast sea as well. Then there is this new sea of need...the frozen embryos. These lives just freshly knit together sitting somewhere waiting for a stomach to grow it. Sitting there because so many couples who could have adopted, couples who wanted a little baby to love and hold; wanted a baby to love and hold that looked just like them. They didn't want to go get one of these millions of other little ones who needed to be held and rocked. So they turned to science and medicine. And now there are too many of them. Science couldn't do it just right so now there are too many embryos for that couple. They just want one or two. Oh, how sad it is.
it so
EPUB 3 will include:
And then we have Danny McBride and Nick Swardson.
Too soon and it was all over. Time to sign books for the wonderful audience who came along, including Polly of Novel Insights, and made it such a wonderful event we didn’t want to end.
- So maybe Mare didn't betray Kelsier after all.
against the old, scarred bench
“I can’t.” Benny repeated from behind eyes of white. “It’s a one-way-street,” a nervous smile ticked across Benny’s lips. Silently he prayed it would be explanation enough.
“That’s ridiculous and you know it. Tutors—and students—are treated pretty well, considering. I don’t think Major Cornwell is planning a reign of terror. Linden was a pain in the . . . Well, the whole campus probably knew what was going on. The major put a stop to it the only way he knew how. That’s all that happened and it isn’t anyone else’s business” His patience was running out and he stepped forward, expecting Katie to move out of his way. When she didn’t, his echoed her posture and with his hands on his hips, he asked, “What would it take to convince you nothing’s going to happen to any of your tutors?”
humming the same tuneless song along
8. Being alone is not that bad
I think I'm in love. This cocktail is a series of delicious contradictions - it's herbal but bright, sweet yet complicated. It's not quite like anything I've ever made before - and yet I can't stop drinking it. I think I'll make one to enjoy, while barefoot, in my little garden. Which might put me pretty close to perfect happiness.
2. “Beautiful Korea. Wonderful Immigration.” For having all our documents photocopied and ready for pick up. Another easily executed Korean Bureaucracy success.
He had changed his name from Swen Jaensson to Swante Palm when he moved to America, and apparently his brothers changed their surnames to Palm as well, but why they did that is anyone’s guess, since I doubt that Texas at that time was overrun with people named Jaensson.
Realistic crime show based in L.A. It’s based on the files of the L.A. County Sheriff’s Office. Sheriff Barrett (Richard Travis) and his crew chase down the bad guys. At the end of each show, real life Sheriff Eugene Bissculuce shows up. He wants the viewers to know the portrayals of police methods are accurate. Considering the other cop shows of the era this one was pretty dull.
"She did, but it wasn't the first question."
Oh, maybe I'll teach Weekend! Awesome with fashion styles and Godard's graphix and so much about consumerism. Maybe bringing in some Guy Debord....Hmmm....Hmmm...
If you watched the video above, you already know how ecstatic Joe was to find out he’s going to have a son. He has a very close relationship with his own father and is looking forward to having a great relationship with his son (and daughter, of course). Now we have the best of both worlds!
Get your vegetables and slice and prepare them and your chicken then add to a hot wok with sesame oil and stir fry for 3 or 4 mins. Then add your chicken stock, remaining marinade mix and coconut milk and cook for a further 10 minutes. Add your noodles for the time it takes to cook them and season your broth with a small amount of fish oil as this is where you’ll get your salty taste (You don’t need to add any salt to Thai or Vietnamese cooking as it’s included in the stocks and seasonings) and if you really like you can add some soy sauce for additional saltiness. You may at the last stage need to add some further lime juice so handy if you have another kicking around just in case.
I am grateful for being able to care for Cecilia for 12 years, 1 month and 28 days
Councilmember 33rd C.D. David Yassky
It should come as no surprise that the state agency head who oversees charter schools has no trouble with double-dipping. Prior to moving to Tallahassee, Michael Kooi was the lobbyist for the same charter school organizations that Haag and Zulueta belong to.
” The “God” sits there smeared with various things, adorned with finest jewels and watches this crap or in some other religions He is conveniently formless. All that milk which is poured on the shivlinga can feed hundreds of malnutritioned kids. Wonder if God knows that. I find this whole Abishekam and shringaram rituals pathetic. Such waste, and to think people pay hefty sum to be a part of this, to watch God bathe. Yikes!
Someone please get me out of these awkward situations!
Hands of clocks turn to noon hours and each floor
Tonight I googled "Sulamith Wulfing" and my corset popped up in the images!
Five spice powder (Pok Aun Thong), 10 gms or 2 table spoons
Mentoring does not have to be about business or even ministry but it should be about learning to be exactly what you have been called to be. I have recently had the pleasure of making contact with Mentor and Discipleship specialist Rob Boyland who has seen the benefit of mentoring firsthand in his own life and in the life of those who he personally mentors. I am honoured to share how God is teaching him to not only use mentoring to ‘disciple’ those who are lost but to help other Believers take on the mantle of mentoring and discipleship to change lives too!
Just slightly seen,
Not a thing in Matilda works. Let's forget the ratty Halloween costume-looking thing we have headlining for a minute. Let's talk about its story. If this was a straight-up parody of boxing films, this would have worked (it almost sounds like a National Lampoon take on Rocky). Even if we had a real kangaroo play the whole flick and just made with the judicious cutting and editing to make it look as if it was boxing and jabbing, that could have worked as well. As it is, every character having a heart-to-heart discussion with each other, Clive Revill bookending the film with directly-into-the-camera monologues about Matilda and how she's affected everybody's lives and playing the whole thing serious (or at least as serious as they play it here), it's deadly. And making with mawkish sentiment about the bad guys realizing how bad they are, the cynical guys realizing they may be just a tad too cynical and the heels realizing how heely they are to everybody... you'd expect violin music to pop up at their moment of truth. In fact, there just may have been - if not, then color me disappointed.
Anyway, to cut a long story short, I am now going to pray hard about this decision that we are having to make. Having a dog is for life, and cannot be taken lightly. We have been chosen because we have given a good home to three rescued dogs, but we must also weigh up other factors such as our current ability to take on another pup and to love it for life.
By the way, there was a nice park close to this restaurant. Everything was made of woods and lots of kids and parents were playing. We played there also with our son and had a great time. I wish we had something like this close to our place.
Tangible tokens
Let Your Conscience Be Your Guide
Once all the rolls are ready, pour the broth and then the crushed tomatoes over them and sprinkle with the parsley and basil. Tuck the bay leaves into the pan.
Start by listing possible user actions
Ironically, May 1st is commemorated as International Workers’ Day because of what happened in the streets of Chicago, Illinois, in 1886.
AND got home to realize I had forgotten the gift boxes I bought because they were not bagged. I am sure they were standing upright on the side of the buggy and I didn't see them.
Si Tu As Besoin D'Un Ami, tender, atomic and eternal, smoothly floats in the air of time, for you.
I tried to fend her off again, this time with a pre emptive condition that I would only do it if she got naked for me. I assumed that the threat of undressing for me and showing me her nude body would dampen her interest in my spurting cock but I misjudged her totally. Instead of being turned off by the idea she was totally turned on by it. I later learned that our “literary discussions” had gotten her totally turned on and that she had learned about masturbation herself and was equally adept as I was about bringing herself to orgasm. I was sunk, but I was also turned on. I relunctantly (but secretly happily) agreed to show her.
Still no heat. The landlord just called. They don't think they will be able to fix it until tomorrow. I think there will be no rent check this month.
old and primary tool of all oppressors to keep the oppressed occupied with
can douse the flames
PPP surveyed 836 likely Republican primary voters on January 18th and 19th. The margin of error for the survey is +/-3.4%.
It’s been over an hour and I swear, it still feels like this day is somehow happening out of time. It’s an odd odd morning.
Kindle edition – short story – 121 KB – .99¢
This is the cookie my brothers and I remember most from my mom's kitchen. I've always loved oatmeal in chocolate chip cookies. These freeze well.
It's Friday so I am joining Michael Lee West's blogging party, Foodie Friday at Designs by Gollum. There are so many interesting recipes shared at this blogging party and you can view those participants entries by clicking HERE.
Don't forget the cutting instructions will be posted for Sliced Apples on Monday May 14th
Saying the word “smoothie” makes me smile and crave a cool, thick mixture of healthy ingredients sliding slowly down into my tummy. I get a chilling sensation now on my skin just imagining the pleasure and taste of a good smoothie. Finding relief from the heat and humidity is always on my mind during the summer season.
Lexicon word of the day: venerate.
The Power Grid is Not Perfection
For as much as people write about the flawed morality of Burns' rebellion, that he is often selfish and impractical in his worldview, today it seems hard to believe that his lifestyle could ever be an issue. Plenty of people today have been spending months living off of unemployment, albeit not by choice as Burns does, and nobody outside of bloviating political media pundits would call them out as bums as Nick fears Murray will be by Childrens' Services. Murray to his credit has much more of a parental impulse than his unseen sister who dumps "Chubby" on him, and while he may not have full-time employment, he's definitely not a layabout sitting at home watching TV and eating Chuckle Chips while Nick goes to school; he's constantly soliciting Nick and anyone else within the range of his voice to visit the city, various landmarks, movie houses. He's taking advantage of free time and frugal living to enjoy the cultural opportunities of New York. It stands to reason one of his objections with 9-to-5 employment is that it leaves people too tired to do anything but come home, shlumpf in front of Chuckles the Chipmunk, and never go on any adventures. If anything, Murray is the prototype for Free-Range Parenting.
It's hard to end my day without the soft kiss on my cheek, and the whisper of "Goodnight Daddy" in my ear.
Product Dimensions: 23.4 x 15.7 x 3.8 cm
Shaz in Oz. whizzed in next with some great snippets makes - using the lushest shades of purple - totally brilliant! To see the results, and also to find out how Shaz made the backgrounds using her brayer go here. Yikes - like Elizabeth I think said, I approach my brayer as if it's a live grenade! Shaz also posted some great photos of where she lives - anyone for a crafting convention Down Under? :) We'd be no bother Shaz :) The pogo sticks would be left in the playground!
22You were taught, with regard to your former way of life, to put off your old self, which is being corrupted by its deceitful desires; 23to be made new in the attitude of your minds; 24and to put on the new self, created to be like God in true righteousness and holiness.
I went with my mom to a party... I always have a great time with her!!!!
3:34 pm: Things had quieted. I decided to take girls to look at rain gear on sale before it was out of stock. First, Nola was asked to hold Holly’s jacket while she tried something on, which she did without comment. But when Holly was asked to return the favor and hold Nola’s jacket, the jacket was tossed over her sister’s head as she announced “I am not a coat rack” and walks away with the attitude of your average MTV video high school dropout backup dancer.
Cutting your hair (did it after my hairdresser cut 21” of hair off me)
In some cases, that is an easy question to answer, cut and dry, but in other circumstances, the answer is entirely arbitrary. We are not here to review and run down a company's name, nor are we here to endorse a company's services. If we were only to review author solutions services according to every point in our ideal list of what an author should get from a company offering publishing services; we would have very few reviews to share with you. In truth, no company has ever attained a 10/10, and only a few have recorded more than 08/10. In the autumn of 2010 we will be posting all our reviews with a rating, and any new reviews since February 2010 have automatically had a posted rating at the bottom of the review.
Drumroll, please . . .
Alberto Colombo Portia on Trial
I turned thirty this weekend. I guess it’s a “landmark” age – the age that smacks of being an adult and mature and all that.
"to us," "to Us."
I still want a Pantocrator. I think it is worth the search. Perhaps in some cathedral shop I will find something so beautiful: or perhaps see one in a church somewhere, and find that seeing it is enough, I do not need to possess it.
26-The Kids Are All Right
When I took the first few bites this morning, I remembered how we met: at a La Leche League meeting, which is sort of like making friends in the gynecologist’s office. Hello, nice to meet you, let’s bond over our strangely large areola.
This was a wonderful experience, not least because of the yummy biscuits I received. The sense of connection with six other people, knowing the care that went into choosing a recipe, baking, packing and sending the biscuits off was really special - I honestly can't decide if I enjoyed receiving or sending them more. Luckily I don't have to choose because I think it was the combination - receiving my biscuits in the post made sending the one's I'd made out that much more meaningful and fun!
So where did the idea come from, that God has ordained top-down chains of command, both in earthly and in spiritual relationships, with human authority structures in every area of life?
I am in a funk. This is not unusual for me but this year it's the worst that I can remember in a long time. It's caused my 'scrap it all' thinking to arrive about a month early.
This is an unforgettable story about fathers and sons. About love and the choices we make that can forever change our lives.
Bottom:
In case you’re keeping score, there is a Soros connection to Fast and Furious. (Of course there’s a Soros connection to practically everything on the left.)
Heather did a brilliant job of showing relationships between the characters. They weren't just people acting out a story, they were people living, loving, grieving, and struggling to understand WITH each other. Did I mention brilliant?
He governs everywhere, and there he reigns;
I didn't like the jumpiness (is that a word?) of teaching a mini lesson, breaking for choices, mini lesson, choices... so I combined several mini lessons into one. I spend 30 minutes teaching the Harcourt lesson for the day. We do the question of the day, phonemic awareness warm-up, a phonics lesson, and a quick grammar lesson. I'm also trying out the Phonics Dance this year. So far I like it :) I try to include a word family several days a week too (on the posters in the picture below-- I just use Vis-a-Vis markers to erase at the end of the year)
I knew I should probably start looking at our options.
Councillors were on board with dedicating extra money to infrastructure, but weren’t prepared to add the 1.5 per cent on top of increases to the city’s operating budget — currently sitting at 3.6 per cent, not including any wage hikes for staff.
If you are not a blogger and you have a favorite store you want to share,
This is Korean BBQ the Vol. 94 way! Korean marinated pork cheeks are served with a gochujang sauce, garlic confit, an asian slaw and grilled duk (mochi) pieces. I seriously could have eaten this whole plate by myself, it was so good. I forget what that green powder was in the front of the plate (something like a korean shiso) but it totally complimented the dish. This will probably become one of Chef Phil’s signature dishes!!
“Worth Dying For” – MikesChair
For a moment the glowing discs
As I finally came to the surface I put my hand over my head, in order to push away any obstruction. My hand came against something smooth and firm with rounded shape. I looked up and realized that it was the cork fender of one of the collapsible lifeboats, which was floating in the water bottom-side up. About four or five men were clinging to her bottom. I pulled myself up as far as I could, almost exhausted, but could not get my legs up. I asked them to give me a hand up, which they readily did.
Tonight I grieve the loss of a great teacher for children wanting to learn about horses. She always loved attention, and when the Girl Scouts asked if they could come out and learn something about horses, she was one of the first horses I thought of for learning to handle a horse on the ground. She was an angel about having her feet handled, and for clipping, I allowed people to practice their clipping skills on Promise because she was so good about having her head muzzle ears and legs handled. I have so many, many pleasant memories of Promise over the past 8 years, I only wish I had more pictures... Tonight I grieve, the loss of my friend my beautiful bay girl, the girl who surreptiously ripped the hood off my chores coat one day when I was giving her scratches. My heart is hurting so much right now, I know I gave her a good life and I didn't allow her to suffer at the end of it, but even this knowledge doesn't make the pain any easier to bear.
I know that traffic is a mess, but anyone who is able to join is welcome. Leave a comment or shoot me an email - we should be somewhat flexible in location.
in the middle of cotton?
Although I love clothes, I hate shopping, and I don't do it very often. More accurately, I hate going shopping, so my favorite places to shop are online: I love the ease of shopping online, and the fact that I can drink a glass of wine while I'm shopping!
Manic Street Preachers Motorcycle emptiness UK
seaweed choking me,
Often I am told by people that they can’t live up to the good that their partner/friend/parent/boss needs them to be. I feel that way at times as well… as long as I don’t fuck up, you’ll be there. As long as I don’t break your trust, your idea of how I should be, then it will all be fine. It’s a lot of pressure for a person to take in. Especially if that pressure is constant and seemingly daunting.
But the Elder Idiot had one option up his sleeve.
Notwithstanding the pardon, the BBC correspondent Caroline Wyatt was of the opinion that the woman’s fate would be little better outside prison, due to the sanctity of ‘family honour’ in Afghanistan. Family honour is so important that it usually comes before individual liberty, freedom, and wellbeing. Reflecting this fact, Gulnaz even conceded that she would have married her attacker if it had meant she were able to go home to her family. However that option had not been given to her and as a result she, and her now newly born child, were living in a ‘women’s’ safe house’. The reality for Gulnaz was that to return after having tarnished her family’s honour, could have lethal consequences. Sadly there are also few ways for women to survive in Afghanistan without family support.
The very next issue is the only non-photo cover of the magazine's 1940's run. Louise Altson paints the cover instead. 14 pages of Miss America comic art and 7 pages of Patsy Walker story art are also in this issue.
i really enjoyed looking through Jen Davis' portfolio and her self-portrait series. there are so many images that i enjoyed (though, at 44 photos, it could be edited down and focused a bit more for the web--that said, i think the breadth helped me understand the project more fully). the project does include several photos that directly address body image and self-esteem, which was at first a turnoff for me--i'd like to see one that doesn't some day--but they are also honest and fit in well with the overall piece.
So we have a situation in Canada where housing prices are rising faster than the average Canadian's ability to meet those prices in an economic environment of low interest rates and record levels of household debt while inflation current rests at 2.3%. This is all feasible, however, so long as interest rates stay low and housing prices keep rising.
Because what I really wanted to post were the details of a recent conversation I had with a friend who reviews books for a reputable publication. I won't name her, because she relies on this job to pay her rent. It's not Ms Cooke, and I'm not referring to The Observer. My friend has given me permission to quote her though, finding all this hoo-ha a "bit of a laugh".
But chiefly they shall take heed, that they teach nothing in their preaching, which they would have the people religiously to observe, and believe, but that which is agreeable to the doctrine of the old Testament, and the new, and that which the catholic fathers, and ancient Bishops have gathered out of that doctrine.
"It's you, it's you, it's all for you
& Felt by Deirdre Baugh
Studies prove that certain elements in life are ruled by our natural abilities, our intuition, our tastes and habits are all influenced by our genetic disposition.
Paint: We used a lot of Benjamin Moore Super White. On the floors we used a Benjamin Moore floor paint – lots of coats.
“Because you know why!” I remember whispering harshly. God I was only eight then. Even so, I didn’t forget the blossoming amusement on her face. She laughed then she asked if I could keep a secret as though we hadn’t argued at all. Since I regretted telling on her I nodded, and she said, “People like listening to what I tell them. Besides he wasn’t worth it!”
Life is hectic. I need to remind myself to take time to smell the flowers more often. (Even though it is fall now and the flowers are longggg gone...) Kam and I have been keeping busy with the hustle and bustle that is our life. Between trips to Daddy's house, work, my gazillion hobbies, and spending time with the special people in my circle, I rarely find time to do this. To write. I need to find time once a week, at minimum, to just sit and type away. The sound of the keyboard is almost therapeutic...almost as therapeutic as making lists. SO...here I go! Consider yourself warned it may be long. :)
a. He lifts up the meek
Once you have that talk, you're going to also have to decide how to handle this.
It is a little confusing on what the steps are to participate, I hope I have it figured out correctly.
Believe you, love you
Arrested yesterday in connection with the bomb plot were Brandon L. Baxter, 20, Connor C. Stevens, 20, Joshua S. Stafford, 23, Douglas L. Wright, 26, and Anthony Hayne, 35. Three of these men, Baxter, Wright, and Hayne "are being charged with conspiracy and attempted use of explosive materials to damage physical property affecting interstate commerce."
Now what about our politicians? We ridicule them for lying, but could they get elected by telling the truth? I doubt it. Let’s say a campaign statement consisted of, “Everything is so screwed up that it will be impossible to make noticeable changes during my term, but this is a great career move for me. Please elect me and I’ll do whatever I can just like any of the other candidates will do.” Are you anxious to vote for this person? I think not!
* 2 teaspoons Worcestershire sauce
You've just got to take each person for what they are and look for the good in them.
He refused to go with us.
The skirt is made in a mixed wool dark green flecked weave
Gin a body meet a body
But then the pale sceptre arises with rueful smile
From the back of the post card is the following statement
In practice, the actuality of bourgeois parliamentary politics, and the fact that it is the Capitalist State, not Parliaments that actually exercise power, has meant that, even where Far Right parties have been in Government, they have been limited in their effectiveness, just as much as Left-wing Governments have faced the same kinds of restrictions. The French FN, is a case in point. In order to make itself electable, and in response to the needs of the reality where it has succeeded in getting candidates elected, it has toned down some of its rhetoric, and in fact, not just the rhetoric. It has become more akin to a traditional constitutionalist Nationalist Party, than a Fascist party, whose real power base is based out in the streets, and whose function is to break up the workers organisations and struggles. In fact, in order to win workers votes, it has been led to adopt a more Strasserite position.
Never had I thought that I would end up at the other end of the power barrel – in my own interview. I was so busy relishing in the success of previous encounters that I did not take the time to prepare for scenario’s that would unexpectedly make a turn into a dimension I was not comfortable in. Had I taken a more realistic and professional approach to my preparation, I would have been able to fall back on other methods and means to either get other band members involved in the conversation – or fall back onto more piercing questions, forcing a different approach in Mr Frontman’s answering. But alas, inexperience dug my grave, with the steady hand of my own over confident persona. Sune : 0 – Mr Frontman: 1.
2) Being a hero to my 2-year-old. He was playing in a box, and he saw a tiny spider which got him pretty scared. So Da-Da took care of it and my little man was eternally grateful.
Free used winter coats.
No, this is more in the line of walking somewhere with my head down, not paying attention to anything in the world but my goal, not noticing the cliff that is right in front of my feet until I'm falling, guts floating with fear, and nothing to look forward to but the sudden and violent stop at the end.
Poor Becca was already there with our tickets waiting for us. So, we had her go inside to hear the first bit. Unfortunately, at this point, I really needed to use the bathroom (thank you, pregnancy) so I literally RAN to the bathroom and we finally found Becca in time to hear the third song.
So if we don't hear from the hospital within the next hour, we can assume we're good to go for tomorrow morning. I will be so glad to have this over with...
was made for several reasons.
May 03 1:32 AM
Don't let me give you the wrong impression, it's not that I don't like a good buzz now and then ;) I've just learned over the years that I can't trust what will happen if I simply follow the instructions when it comes to drugs. For instance, Valium .. and cocaine (I grew up in the 60's, OF COURSE I experimented) have No. Effect. Whatsoever. Nada ... zilch. Some cold medicines, however (Sinutab anybody?) will knock me flat on my ass. You would swear I was asleep, or unconscious. I'm not though, I can hear everything going on around me ... I just can't respond. And then there's aspirin. I am the only person I know that it makes incredibly sleepy ... and some kinds of speed put me to sleep before they wire me up.
In my family, if you needed a cook, caterer, party planner, babysitter, pediatrician, guidance counselor, conflict resolution specialist, teacher, nurse, seamstress, chauffeur, pet sitter, vet, wildlife rehabilitator, horticulturist, or historian, you just called Mam-Maw. She was busy. But she always had time to laugh at your horrible comedy routine, and no matter how full her hands were, she always applauded vigorously at your dance recital. She would exclaim with pride over your drawings, even if they were merely scribbles to everyone else. Most of all, she believed in your dreams, and she taught you to believe in them. If you needed a hug, a hand to hold, a pat on the back, a shoulder to cry on, an encouraging word, or a kick in the behind, Mam-Maw provided it. The phrase "all things to all people" was made for her.
16:45: Patrick Basham believes the UK should be "cautiously pessimistic" about government's attacks on alcohol as he sees the Conservative party intent on "maintaining a paternalistic approach".
Lesson Three. You can do it. But let's say you cannot. You have to do it anyway so you may as well find out now than delay the inevitable. I could either do it now or later. If I do it later the procrastination will not be useful. So in any project I must face any fear of failure and do it now.
She opens every show with something dramatic, like “Breaking News tonight” and then she says, “Live from Tucson, Arizona.”
I liked how the main character alluded to things in the future (since she was telling the story). Some might not like the way she does it, but I appreciated it. It was as if she was really telling the story and expected that you would know the details of what happens in the future. I had to do a bit of research afterward to understand everything she was alluding to, and I think I have a bit more to do before I have a decent understanding of the time period and general history of the place.
for hayrides and drinking yummy apple cider!
1 box Nilla wafers
"Here goes nothing." That was my comment before taking off for the Lake Wobegon Trail marathon yesterday morning. I didn't know what the day would have in store for me, as is usually the case before a marathon. 26.2 is a lot of miles and lots of things can happen.
"You know. You just shot a bunny."
To lessen the risks that come with erratic income-generating opportunities, Grameen Foundation’s Solutions for the Poorest (SfP) team is trying to gradually enhance the skills of the primary breadwinners of the households participating in the initiative, and connect them to more stable livelihood activities. These activities include supplementary income-generating opportunities that are often seasonal and low-skill, as well as entrepreneurial or productive activities that have a higher income-generating potential and often require increased skill sets and start-up capital.
As I’ve been thinking about this—realizing more often than not, I just don’t know—I’m trying to convince myself that it’s okay not to have the answers to everything. That not everything has to happen for a reason. That sometimes life is about not knowing and therein lies some of the beauty and magic.
40. Theodore Boone, Kid Lawyer John Grisham
Spelling
Second — and at the other end of the state, the Everglades Restoration Project has to be completed, and it’s the federal government which has failed.
The result is a beer that's designed to be very hoppy. It has the hop bitterness and profile of an IPA, but with the hop character of a pilsner. Cleanness of the flavor profile will come from fermenting with lager yeast. Added spiciness will complement the malt character by including malted rye. A unique hybridization of existing beer styles has created something completely new and different.
At 12, Powell had her career taken over by a local promoter, Carl Werner, who helped her get selected as the Oregon Victory Girl. She traveled around the state for two years, singing and selling victory bonds. It was during this time that she first met Lana Turner. Powell presented her with flowers and sang for her. Years later, when they met again at MGM, Turner did not remember her. According to Powell, even after meeting her many times, Turner never remembered who she was.[2]
Nothing here ever changes,
I must not eat green cheese and ham.
The illustrations are cuter than pie.
First, a cautionary tale: At the age of twenty, I flew from Sydney, Australia to Saigon, Vietnam with a layover in Singapore. Caught up in the excitement, I failed to research the travel visa requirements for Americans. Turns out I had to learn this lesson the hard way…
As of today, over a month away from the screenings, tickets are selling fast and I predict it’ll be sold out in no time!
hit singles with songs about oddball mystics like Gurdjieff and
Hey! Guess what you didn't know what you needed until just now? The Jean Rollin Weird Wobbler bobblehead figure from Cult Collectibles. Now you can think of nothing else, right? The demented geniuses who turned "Dolemite's" Rudy Ray Moore and "Demons'" Geretta Geretta into bizarro desk decorations designed to make all your colleagues uneasy are creating what may very well be the strangest-ever tribute to the French Master of the Fantastique.
07. Kashmir
I've found some crafts that serve more as stress relievers than others, and once in a while, I just get a yearning to pick up a needle and thread or a pair of knitting needles and some soft, fuzzy yarn and find a quiet place to work, lost in my own thoughts. For me, the best craft for stress relief is knitting. More than once, I've been know to knit "nothing" just for the fun of it and the relief from the day that it gives me. It's a mindless, relaxing thing that I can do while watching TV or chatting with my husband, and when I'm done, I can tear it out, roll it back up in a ball, and use it again another time.
Of course, we will also get new lighting when the time comes, as the boob light above the eating nook isn't quite cutting it. So some sort of awesome pendant or chandy will replace it. But for now, my head is already spinning with everything on the to do list! :) I hope you enjoyed a peek into my head. You got to see the good stuff; there are other parts that are a little scary.
Violent Femmes is the debut album by Violent Femmes, released on November 30, 1982, and again one year later (with two extra tracks "Ugly" and "Gimme the Car").The album went platinum nine years after it was released.
“Dump Online Redo for Buffers in Pin History”
The most notable features for iOS 5.1 are Siri support for Japanese users, a new camera app for iPad, and a new camera shortcut.
McBride, assisted Gordon Webster to escape from police custody at the Edenvale Hospital, in Pietermaritzburg. Webster was arrested by the South African Police during the latter part of April 1986. Shots fired by McBride during the escape killed a black man, Mlungize Buthelezi, and injured two others namely, Simpiwe Shage and Nkosinathi Nkabini.
And then these wonderful, talented, generous
“Always in motion is the future.”
Our old girl Ditto, who is 14 now and has developed some form of dementia (or so
The Sat-Nav had been set to "avoid traffic."
Sarah was raised in Minnesota and at the impressionable age of fourteen she traveled with her Father, an Ophthalmologist, on a medical mission trip to Ghana, Africa. Having lived a comfortable life in suburban Minnesota, she was overwhelmed with the poverty that she saw on her first trip to the third world. It greatly impacted her life decisions moving forward and it was because of the experience that she wanted to pursue a career that would help others. As a result, Sarah attended Bethel University and graduated with a BA in Elementary Education. She taught first and second grade for seven years in both Minnesota and Illinois. During that time, she was placed on leadership teams and received a Masters of Education degree with a 4.0 from National Louis University.
The same night I finished the blanket, I saw on facebook a link for a Leap year blanket project, where you knit a square everyday, resulting in a lovely hand knitted blanket at the end of the year! I decided to join thinking that this could be a great way for my confidence to grow and hopefully learn a few techniques along the way! When I started the blanket, my mum cast on for me, so to start my first square, I had to go back to Youtube and learn how to do this, and again, I picked it up fairly easily and I thought it would be a lovely way to use up the last bit of wool I had leftover from the baby blanket
Most of you know I am a big Pinterest fan - I go for pinterest for inspiration almost on a daily basis! One of the biggest things I love it for is recipes! And.... maybe that's because recipes are one of the FEW pins I actually complete.... yeesh.
EJ: Working at an architectural firm, cranking out amazing designs for my clients, possibly even partnering and having the pleasure to work for myself. I think that would be a good life. Changing the planet one design at a time.
I am also excited because Banks has been getting a few of the most adorable outfits...I will have to do a post with some of my favorites so far. Seeing those little clothes and imagining my little boy in them is surreal.
There are a lot of things that just go together! While I was doing my meal planning this week I thought about foods that naturally go together. So, first, my wacky view…foods that go together, wacky togetherness!
You read that right. A milkshake with Kahlua and Nutella. It actually had Bailey's in it too but that wasn't in the picture. I don't even need to tell you how awesome this tasted. And how awesome I got after I had a gigantic glass of it.
Driesell has focused on his team’s defensive issues each and every time he’s discussed the squad’s performances, notably on the post-game radio show. I’ll say this, he’s not one to sugarcoat things, as anyone who has listened to the show can attest.
